<i>WORD</i>
ISSN: 0043-7956 (Print) 2373-5112 (Online) Journal homepage: http://www.tandfonline.com/loi/rwrd20
Categories of the Theory of Grammar
M. A. K. Halliday
To cite this article: M. A. K. Halliday (1961) Categories of the Theory of Grammar, <i>WORD</
i>, 17:2, 241-292, DOI: 10.1080/00437956.1961.11659756
To link to this article: http://dx.doi.org/10.1080/00437956.1961.11659756
Published online: 04 Dec 2015.
Submit your article to this journal
Article views: 11
View related articles
Citing articles: 17 View citing articles
Full Terms & Conditions of access and use can be found at
http://www.tandfonline.com/action/journalInformation?journalCode=rwrd20
Download by: [162.247.72.216] Date: 14 March 2016, At: 21:17
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
M.A. K. HALLIDAY---------------
Categories of the Theory
of Grammar
There have been in the main two approaches to description in modern
linguistics: the "textual" and the non-textual or, for want of a better word,
"exemplificatory." More recently a third has been added, primarily in
grammar but lately also in phonology, the "generative" (strictly "trans-
formative-generative," since generation does not presuppose transforma-
tion). Some linguists have gone so far as to suggest that transformative
generation should replace other types of description I as a linguistic method
of making statements about language.2 Others, myself included, feel that
all three approaches have a fundamental place in linguistics; that they do
different things, and that the third is a valuable supplement to the first
two. 3
Description is however not theory. All description, whether generative
or not, is related to General Linguistic theory; specifically, to that part of
General Linguistic theory which accounts for how language works. The
different types of description are bodies of method which derive from, and
are answerable to, that theory. Each has its place in linguistics, and it is a
1 It is in no way to deny the fundamental importance of Chomsky's work, in Syntactic
Structures (Janua Linguarum no. 4, 1957) and elsewhere, if we suggest that the readiness
of linguists who had previously worked in the "Bioomfieldian" tradition to abandon
these methods in favour of Chomsky's is in part due to their lack of theoretical founda-
tion. The point of view adopted here is that transformation-generation is a type of
description which, like other types, depends on but does not replace a theory.
2 Even Chomsky ("Generative Grammar," Word XVII (1961), 219-239), seems to
imply that a textual study cannot be theoretical. But a grammar of one short text may
be based on theory; and any theory-based grammar, transformational or not, can be
stated in generative terms.
3 Those linguists who have followed up the work of Firth have always tended to give
more weight to textual description than have those following Bloomfield, since for
the former meaning and the statement of meaning have always been integrated in the
theory. Cf. Firth, "Synopsis of Linguistic Theory" (Studies in Linguistic Analysis
(Special Volume of the Philological Society) Oxford, Blackwell, 1957), p.ll, and p. 23:
"The object of linguistic analysis as here understood is to make statements of meaning
so that we may see how we use language to live."
1--w. 241
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
242 M. A. K. HALLIDAY
pity to deny the value of textual description (which is appropriate, for
example, in "stylistics," the linguistic study of literature) just because
certain of the methods used in description are found to be inadequate.
My purpose in writing this paper is to suggest what seem to me to be the
fundamental categories of that part of General Linguistic theory which is
concerned with how language works at the level of grammar, with brief
reference to the relations between grammar and lexis and between gram-
mar and phonology. The theory sketched out here derives most of all from
the work of J. R. Firth.4 At the same time I do not of course imply that I
think Professor Firth would necessarily have found himself in accord with
all the views expressed, which in some places depart from his own; nor do
I underestimate the debt to my present colleagues and the many others
whose work I have, obviously, drawn on.s
No excuse is needed, I think, for a discussion of General Linguistic
theory. While what has made linguistics fashionable has been, as with other
subjects, the discovery that it has applications, these applications rest on
many years of work by people who were simply seekers after knowledge.
It would not help the subject if the success of these applications led us into
thinking that the theoretical problems were solved and the basic issues
closed.
STARTING POINT
It will perhaps be helpful if the point of departure is first made clear.
The following is a summary of what is taken as "given" for the purposes of
this paper.
1.1. One part of General Linguistic theory is a theory of how language
works. It is from this that the methods of Descriptive Linguistics are
derived.
4 Professor Firth died on 14 December 1960. I had just completed this paper and was
planning to show it to him on the following day. Although he had not seen it and was in
no way directly responsible for any of the opinions formulated here, the influence of his
teaching and of his great scholarship will, I hope, be clearly apparent.
See especially Firth, "Synopsis," passim; also "Papers in Linguistics 1934-1951,"
London, Oxford University Press, 1957, chapters 9, 10, 14, 15, 16, "Structural Lin-
guistics" (Transactions of the Philological Society 1955) and "Applications of General
Linguistics" (Transactions of the Philological Society 1957).
5 Of major importance to me have been discussions, both on linguistic theory as a
whole and on the specific subjects mentioned, with J. C. Catford, J. 0. Ellis, A. Mcintosh
(lexis and "delicacy"-the latter concept is of his origination), J. M. Sinclair (English
grammar) and J. P. Thorne (logical structure of linguistic theory, and the work of
Chomsky).
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
CATEGORIES OF THE THEORY OF GRAMMAR 243
1.2. The relevant theory consists of a scheme of interrelated categories
which are set up to account for the data, and a set of scales of abstraction
which relate the categories to the data and to each other. The data to be
accounted for are observed language events, observed as spoken or as
codified in writing, any corpus of which, when used as material for lin-
guistic description, is a "text." 6
1.3. Description consists in relating the text to the categories of the theory.
The methods by which this is done involve a number of processes of ab-
straction, varying in kind and variable in degree. It is the theory that
determines the relation of these processes of abstraction to each other and
to the theory.7
1.4. The theory requires that linguistic events should be accounted for at a
number of different levels: this is found to be necessary because of the
difference in kind of the processes of abstraction involved.8
1.5. The primary levels are "form," "substance" and "context." The sub-
stance is the material of language: "phonic" (audible noises) or "graphic"
(visible marks). The form is the organization of the substance into mean-
ingful events: "meaning" is a concept, and a technical term, of the theory
(see below, 1.8). The context is the relation of the form to non-linguistic
"As used by Firth, loc. cit.; cf. "Papers" p. 225. Here "text" refers to the event under
description, whether it appears as corpus (textual description), example (exemplificatory)
or terminal string (transformative-generative).
7 The set of these abstractions, constituting the body of descriptive method, might be
regarded as a "calculus," since its function is to relate the theory to the data. It is im-
portant to distinguish between calculus (description) and theory; also between descrip-
tion and the set of generalizations and hypotheses by which the theory was arrived at in
the first place. The latter precede the theory and are not susceptible of "rigorization;"
though we may distinguish the logical stages of observation-generalization-hypothe-
tization-thcory, keeping Hjclmslev's distinction between "hypothesis" and "theory"
(Prolegomena to a theory of language. (International Joumal of American Linguistics,
Memoir no. 7, 1953), p. 8; cf. W. S. Allen, "Relationship in Comparative Linguistics"
(Transactions of the Philological Society 1953), p. 53). Here we are concerned with the
stages, once the theory is formulated, of theory-description-text.
s Since the theory is a theory of how language works, it does not matter whether the
levels are considered levels of language or levels of linguistics (theory or description): it
comes to the same thing. Cf. Firth, "Papers," p. 143: "We must expect therefore that
linguistic science will also find it necessary to postulate the maintenance of linguistic
patterns and systems ... within which there is order, structure and function. Such
systems are maintained in activity, and in activity they are to be studied. It is on these
grounds that linguistics must be systemic;" and cf. pp. 187, 192.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
244 M. A. K. HALLIDAY
features of the situations in which language operates, and to linguistic
features other than those of the item under attention: these being together
"extratextual" features.
1.6. The complete framework of levels requires certain further sub-
divisions and additions, and is as follows:
(a) Substance may be either "phonic" or "graphic"
(b) If substance is phonic, it is related to form by "phonology"
(c) If substance is graphic, it is related to form by "orthography" (or
"graphology"),9 either
(i) if the script is lexical, then directly, or
(ii) if the script is phonological, then via phonology
(d) Form is in fact two related levels, "grammar" and "lexis"
(e) Context is in fact (like phonology) an "interlevel," relating form to
extratextual features.
1.7. The study of phonic substance belongs to a distinct but related body
of theory, that of General Phonetics. Since phonology relates form and
phonic substance, it is the place where linguistics and phonetics inter-
penetrate. Linguistics and phonetics together make up "the linguistic
sciences." to
Phonetics I
I
Linguistics
SUBSTANCE -<--- phonic - substance
I I
FORM I -<--- I
SITUATION
-phonology ""- i/context ---(extra-textual
I "'-{gra_mmar}/ features)
lex1s _ ,
i
---
-~--- /
/
graphic - -orthography I
substance ;
i
1.8. Language has "formal meaning" and "contextual meaning." Formal
meaning is the "information" of information theory, though (i) it can be
stated without being quantified and was in fact formulated in linguistics
independently of the development of information theory as a means of
9 Cf. A. Mcintosh, "The analysis of written Middle English" (Transactions of the
Philological Society 1956). Professor Mcintosh has recently followed this up with a
further, so far unpublished, study of the underlying theoretical problems.
IO 1.5-1.7 may be summarized schematically as follows:
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
CATEGORIES OF THE THEORY OF GRAMMAR 245
quantifying it,ll and (ii) formal meaning in texis cannot be quantified until
a method is found for measuring the information of non-finite ("open")
sets (see below, 2.1 and 8.2). The formal meaning of an item is its operation
in the network of formal relations.
1.9. Contextual meaning, which is an extension of the popular-and
traditional linguistic-notion of meaning, is quite distinct from formal
meaning and has nothing whatever to do with "information." 12 The con-
textual meaning of an item is its relation to extra textual features; but this
is not a direct relation of the item as such, but of the item in its place in
linguistic form: contextual meaning is therefore logically dependent on
formal meaning. u
1.10. It follows from 1.8 and 1.9 that, in description, formal criteria are
crucial, taking precedence over contextual criteria; and that the statement
of formal meaning logically precedes the statement of contextual
meaning. 14
II Cf. Firth, "Papers," p. 227: "A nominative in a four-case system would in this sense
necessarily have a different 'meaning' from a nominative in a two-case or in a fourteen-
case system, for example." The article from which this is quoted, "General Linguistics
and Descriptive Grammar," was published in 1951; but Firth's view of the "dispersal of
meaning," that (i) form is meaningful and (ii) formal meaning is distinct from con-
textual meaning, antedates this by some time; it is in fact already clear, though without
the precise formulation of formal meaning, in "The Technique of Semantics" (1935)
(also reprinted in "Papers").
12 Some of what has been written on information theory and language is vitiated by
the confusion between these two levels of meaning; cf. my reviews of Whatmough:
Language: A Modem Syllfhesis and Herdan: Language as Choice and Chance in Archiuum
Linguisticum 10 (ii) and II (ii). It is doubtful whether, even if contextual meaning can ever
be quantified, it has anything to do with "information;" the latter is a function of the
operation of (a term in) a system, and a linguistic item can never be a term in a con-
textual system even if such a thing can be rigorously described. Cf. below, 10.7.
13 The reason why "context" is preferred to "semantics" as the name of this interlevel
is that "semantics" is too closely tied to one particular method of statement, the con-
ceptual method; cf. Firth, "Synopsis" pp. 9-10, 20. The latter, by attempting to link
language form to unobservables, becomes circular, since concepts are only observable
as (exponents of) the forms they are set up to "explain." The linguistic statement of
context attempts to relate language form to (abstractions from) other (i.e. extratextual)
observables.
14 Cf. Firth, "Synopsis," p. 15: "References to non-verbal constituents of situations
are admissible in corroboration of formal linguistic characteristics stated as criteria for
setting up ... word-classes." The approach to context from the other end, that is from
non-language, has been developed in an important monograph by William E. Bull:
Time, tense and the verb (Univ. of California Publications in Linguistics no. 19, 1960), as
what he (perhaps unfortunately, in view of the formal use of "system") calls "systemic
246 M. A. K. HALLIDAY
1.11. Finally, it is necessary to distinguish not only between theory and
description but also between description and presentation. Presentation,
the way the linguist expounds the description, varies with purpose, and
relative merit is judged by reference to the specific purpose intended.
Description depends on the theory; theoretical validity is demanded, and
relative merit is judged by reference to comprehensiveness and delicacy.15
GRAMMAR
2.1. Grammar is that level of linguistic form at which operate closed
systems.t6, 17 Since a system is by definition closed, the use of the term
"closed" here is a mnemonic device; but since "system" alone will be used
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
linguistics." The difficulty of this method lies in deciding on what Bull calls (p. 3) "those
features of objective reality which are pertinent to the problem," since this can only be
known by reference to linguistic forms: cf. e.g. p. 17 "it may be assumed that normal
people automatically divide, on the preverbal level, all events into three categories:
those anterior to PP (point present) ... , those simultaneous with PP ... , and those
posterior to PP;" p. 20 "The languages of the dominant world cultures use vector
formulas, and the discussion which follows is therefore concerned only with the structure
of a hypothetical tense system based on the vector principle;" p. 24 "The system, of
course, would break down if a plus form were to be used to describe a minus event or if
a form indicating anticipation were used for recollection." This does not invalidate the
approach; it does suggest that it will have to be part of a study of context which starts
from form as well as from "objective reality," as phonology works both from form and
from substance; context, like phonology, is in a real sense an interlevel.
15 Theoretical validity implies making maximum use of the theory (see below, 2.3 and
6.2). It is not necessary to add a separate criterion of "simplicity," since this is no use
unless defined; and it would then turn out to be a property of a maximally grammatical
description, since complication equals a weakening of the power of the theory and hence
less grammaticalness. It should perhaps also be mentioned here that the distinction
between methods of description and discovery procedures is here taken for granted
throughout (cf. below, 2.3). We are not concerned with how the linguist "finds out" how
an event is to be described. This is no more capable of scientific exposition than are the
steps by which the theory was arrived at in the first place-in fact less, since the latter
can at least be formulated, while the former can only be summed up in the words of the
song: "I did what I could."
16 Cf. Firth, "Synopsis," p. 22 (and above 1.8 n. II); R. H. Robins, "Some Considera-
tions on the status of grammar in linguistics" Archiuum Li11guisticum XI (1959), 101;
Garvin, see below (6.3 n. 60).
17 "Grammar" is also the name for the study of grammar; as with "level" (above,
1.4 n. 8), it is unnecessary to distinguish between "the grammar" of a language and
"grammar" in theory and description-though a distinction is often made between
"lexis" and "lexicology," the latter being the study of lexis. Again, not a set of discovery
procedures, but a set of properties of what the linguist accounts for grammatically. The
grammar of a language can only be "defined" as that part of the language that is
accounted for by grammatical description.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
CATEGORIES OF THE THEORY OF GRAMMAR 247
as the name of one of the four fundamental grammatical categories (see
below, 6) it is useful to retain "closed system" when referring to the
system as the crucial criterion for distinguishing grammar from lexis.
A closed system is a set of terms with these characteristics:
(a) the number of terms is finite: they can be listed as A B C D, and all
other items E ... are outside the system.
(b) each term is exclusive of all the others: a given term A cannot be
identical with B or C or D.
(c) if a new term is added to the system this changes the meaning of all
the others.ts
Any part of linguistic form which is not concerned with the operation of
closed systems belongs to the level of lexis. The distinction between
closed system patterns and open set patterns in language is in fact a
cline; but the theory has to treat them as two distinct types of pattern
requiring different categories. For this reason General Linguistic theory
must here provide both a theory of grammar and a theory of lexis, and
also a means of relating the two. A description depending on General
Linguistic theory will need to separate the descriptions of the two levels
both from each other and from the description of their interrelations. This
paper is primarily concerned with the theory of grammar, though re-
ference will be made to lexis at various points.
2.2. The fundamental categories for the theory of grammar are four:
"unit," "structure," "class," and "system." These are categories of the
IS The reference is, of course, to formal meaning: it is form that is under discussion.
It may always happen that the addition of a new term changes the contextual meaning
of at least one of the others, since terms that are formally mutually exclusive are likely
to carry contextual distinctions; but this is not a property of a system. The "addition"
of a new term is not of course considered as a process (though historical change is one
type of instance of it): it may be displayed in any comparison of two related systems.
For example, two possible systems of first and second person pronouns used by different
speakers of Italian (quoted in oblique disjunct form; I= "interior to social group,"
E "exterior ... "):
me me
I+ noi noi
21 te te
21+ voi
2E lei
}voi
2E+ I oro
(The distinctions made in written Italian are ignored, since they would not affect the
point.) The difference in formal meaning is a function of the different number of terms:
in system one me excludes five others, in system two only three. In contextual meaning
only terms of the 2 group are affected.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
248 M.A. K. HALLIDAY
highest order of abstraction: they are established, and interrelated, in the
theory. If one asks: "why these four, and not three, or five, or another
four?'', the answer must be: because language is like that-because these
four, and no others, are needed to account for the data: that is, to account
for all grammatical patterns that emerge by generalization from the data.
As the primary categories of the theory, they make possible a coherent
account of what grammar is and of its place in language, and a compre-
hensive description of the grammars of languages, neither of which is
possible without them.
Each of the four is specifically related to, and logically derivable from,
each of the others. There is no relation of precedence or logical priority
among them. They are all mutually defining: as with theoretical categories
in general, "definition" in the lexicographical sense is impossible, since no
one category is defined until all the others are, in the totality of the theory.19
The order chosen here for exposition is therefore simply that which seemed
the easiest: namely the order in which they are listed above.
The relation of these categories to each other and to the data involve
three distinct scales of abstraction, those of "rank,'' "exponence," and
"delicacy;" these are considered separately (see below, 7) but have also to
be referred to in connection with the categories. In discussing these I have
used the terms "hierarchy," "taxonomy," and "cline" as general scale-
types. A hierarchy is taken to mean a system of terms related along a single
dimension which must be one involving some form of logical precedence
(such as inclusion).20 A taxonomy is taken to mean a special type of hier-
archy, one with two additional characteristics: (i) there is a constant rela-
tion of each term to the term immediately following it, and a constant
reciprocal relation of each to that immediately preceding it; and (ii) degree
19 Cf. Firth, "Synopsis," p. 2: "Moreover, these and other technical words are given
their 'meaning' by the restricted language of the theory, and by application of the
theory in quoted works." This is true of descriptive categories too: "noun" can no more
be defined in a glossary than "structure."
20 I should therefore agree with Palmer that linguistic levels do not form a hierarchy:
(F. R. Palmer, "Linguistic Hierarchy," Lingua VII (1958), 241. His view is "that there
are levels, but only in the widest sense, and that these are related in specific, but different,
ways. The set of relationships cannot be regarded as a hierarchy, except in the loosest
sense of the word." Palmer however appears to reintroduce procedural hierarchy when
he says (p. 240), "The procedure is not from phonetics via phonology to grammar, but
from grammar via phonology to phonetics, though with the reminder that the phonetic
statement is the basis, i.e. the ultimate justification for the analysis." I would rather say
that there is order among the levels, determined by their interrelations, but (a) no
hierarchy, in the defined sense of the word, and (b) no procedural direction. Unfor-
tunately Palmer excludes this use of "order:" (pp. 231-232) "There is a statable order of
levels ... and, therefore, a hierarchy" (in reference to Hockett).
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
CATEGORIES OF THE THEORY OF GRAMMAR 249
is significant, so that the place in order of each one of the terms, statable as
the distance in number of steps from either end, is a defining characteristic
of that term.2t A cline resembles a hierarchy in that it involves relation
along a single dimension; but instead of being made up of a number of
discrete terms a cline is a continuum carrying potentially infinite gradation.
2.3. In this view of linguistics description is, as already emphasized, a body
of method derived from theory, and not a set of procedures. This has one
important consequence. If description is procedural, the only way of
evaluating a given description is by reference to the procedures themselves:
a good description is one that has carried out the right procedures in the
right order, but for any more delicate evaluation external criteria have to
be invoked. Moreover every language has to be treated as if it was un-
known, otherwise procedural rules will be violated; so the linguist has to
throw away half his evidence and a good few of his tools.
A theory on the other hand provides a means for evaluating descriptions
without reference to the order in which the facts are accounted for. The
linguist makes use of all he knows and there is no priority of dependence
among the various parts of the description. The best description is then
that which, comprehensiveness presupposed, is maximally grammatical:
that is, makes maximum use of the theory to account for a maximum
amount of the data. Simplicity has then to be invoked only when it is
necessary to decide between fewer systems with more terms and more
systems with fewer terms: and since both information theory and lin-
guistic intuition favour the latter even this preference might be built in to
the theory.22
21 Immediate Constituent analysis, for example, yields a hierarchy that is not a
taxonomy: it does not fulfil criterion (ii). (It may not always fulfil (i): cf. C. F. Hockett,
"Two models of grammatical description," Readings in Linguistics (ed. M. Joos,
Washington, ACLS, 1957), p. 391: "There must be also at least a few utterances in
which the hierarchical structure is ambiguous, since otherwise the hierarchical structure
would in every case be determined by form and order, and hence not a 'primitive'.")
22 The theory thus leads to "polysystemic"-ness in description-both syntagmatically
and paradigmatically. Syntagmatic polysystemic statement follows from the linking of
classes and systems to places in structure (see below, 4-6), so that the question "how can
we prove that the b of beak and the b of cab are occurrences of one and the same
phoneme?" (C. L. Ebeling, "Linguistic Units," Janua Linguarum XII (1960), p. 17) is
regarded as an unreal one; cf. Palmer "Comparative Statement and Ethiopian Semitic"
(Transactions of the Philological Society, 1958), pp. 122-124); Firth "Papers," p. 121,
"Structural Linguistics," p. 93; J. Carnochan "Glottalization in Hausa" (Transactions
of the Philological Society, 1952), p. 78; R. H. Robins, "Vowel Nasality in Sundanese,"
Studies in Linguistic Analysis, p. 96; and Eugenie Henderson, "The Phonology of Loan-
words in Some South-east Asian Languages" (Transactions of the Philological Society,
1951), p. 132.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
250 M. A. K. HALLIDAY
UNIT
3.1. Language is patterned activity. At the formal level, the patterns are
patterns of meaningful organization: certain regularities are exhibited over
certain stretches of language activity. An essential feature of the stretches
over which formal patterns operate is that they are of varying extent.
Abstracting out those of lexis, where the selection is from open sets, we find
that the remaining, closed system, patterns are associated with stretches that
not only are of differing extent but also appear as it were one inside the
other, in a sort of one-dimensional Chinese box arrangement. Since
language activity takes place in time, the simplest formulation of this
dimension is that it is the dimension of time, or, for written language, of
linear space: the two can then be generalized as "progression" and the
relation between two items in progression is one of "sequence."
But there is a danger here. It is obvious that absolute measurements of
linear progression belong to language substance (where one may be in-
terested in the number of seconds, or possibly even the number of inches,
occupied by an utterance). What is less obvious is that the whole dimension
of progression in fact belongs to substance, and that the stretches which
carry grammatical patterns-or rather the members of that abstract cate-
gory that we set up to account for these stretches-have to be ranged on a
dimension of which linear progression is only a manifestation in substance:
a dimension we may call "order." 23 By implication, this allows that in any
given instance sequence may not manifest order, or that order may have
Paradigmatically, the "simplicity" referred to here follows from the requirement of
making maximum use of the category of "system" by polysystemic or "multidimen-
sional" statement in grammar; cf. my "Grammatical Categories in Modern Chinese"
(Transactions of the Philological Society, 1956), p. 192.
23 "Manifestation" (in substance) and "realization" (in form) are introduced here to
represent different degrees along the scale of exponence (see below, 7.3). In this paper I
have used "exponent" as indicating relative position on the exponence scale (a formal
item as exponent of a formal category, and a feature of substance as exponent of a
formal category or item); this departs from the practice of those who restrict the term
"exponent" to absolute exponents in substance. As used here, "formal item" is a tech-
nical term for the endpoint of the exponence relation ("most exponential" point) in
form: the lexical item "cat," the word "cat" as member of the word class of noun, the
morpheme "-ing" (as class member operating at the place of an element) in word
structure, etc.; it is thus already an abstraction from substance and will be stated
orthographically or phonologically. In this formulation, exponence is the only relation
by which formal category, formal item and feature of substance are linked on a single
scale: hence the need for a single term to indicate relative position on the scale. Two
defined positions on this scale can then be distinguished as "realization" and '"mani-
festation."
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
CATEGORIES OF THE THEORY OF GRAMMAR 251
other manifestations; even if this never happens, the distinction is necessary
until such time as it is shown that the theory does not need to make pro-
vision for its happening. In fact it does happen: sequence is a variable, and
must be replaced in the theory by the more abstract dimension of order. 24
3.2. The category set up to account for the stretches that carry gram-
matical patterns is the "unit." The units of grammar form a hierarchy that
is a taxonomy. To talk about any hierarchy, we need a conversational scale;
the most appropriate here might seem that of size, going from "largest" to
"smallest;" on the other hand size is difficult to represent in tables and
diagrams, and may also trap one into thinking in substantial terms, and a
vertical scale, from "highest" to "lowest," has advantages here. For the
moment we may use both, eventually preferring the latter. The relation
among the units, then, is that, going from top (largest) to bottom (smallest},
each "consists of" one, or of more than one, of the unit next below (next
smaller). The scale on which the units are in fact ranged in the theory needs
a name, and may be called "rank."
"Consists of," like "unit" and "rank," also belongs to the theory: its
realization in form varies between and within languages, and is stated of
course in description.2s The possibilities are sequence, inclusion and con-
flation. Thus if in a given instance a unit of one rank consists of two units
of rank next below, these may appear in form as one following, interrupt-
ing, or overlaying the other.
Three further points about the rank relation need to be clarified. First,
the theory allows for downward "rank shift:" the transfer of a (formal re-
alization of a) given unit to a lower rank. Second, it does not allow for
upward rank shift. Third, only whole units can enter into higher units.
Taken together these three mean that a unit can include, in what it consists
of, a unit of rank higher than or equal to itself but not a unit of rank more
than one degree lower than itself; and not, in any case, a part of any unit. 26
24 Cf. Firth, "Synopsis," p. 5: "In these structures, one recognizes the place and order
of the categories. This, however, is very different from the successivity of bits and pieces
in a unidirectional time sequence."
25 Cf. above, 3.1 n. 23.
26 The two latter restrictions represent an important addition to the power of the
"unit" as a theoretical category. The first toleration is required to account for "regres-
sive" structures: cf. Victor H. Yngve, "A Model and an Hypothesis for Language
Structure," Proceedings of the American Philosophical Society, 104 (v), p. 19. As
Chomsky has said ("Syntactic Structures," pp. 23-24), "the assumption that languages
are infinite is made in order to simplify the description of these languages ... If a gram-
mar does not have recursive devices it will be prohibitively complex." Yngve makes the
important distinction between "progressive" and "regressive" structures, accounting for
them separately in his model. Whether or not he is right in postulating a depth limit (of
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
252 M.A. K. HALLIDAY
3.3. The number of units in the hierarchy is a feature of the description.
It varies from language to language, but is fixed by the description for each
language, or rather for each describendum or "etat de langue." The possi-
bility of there being only one is excluded by the theory, since a hierarchy
cannot be composed of one member. It is however theoretically possible
to conceive of a language having only two, and an artificial language could
be constructed on these lines (whereas it would not be possible to construct
an artificial language having only one unit). English grammar, as far as it
has been studied to date, seems to require five, though further, statistical,
work on grammar might yield at least one more.
No special status, other than that 27 presupposed by rank, is assigned by
grammatical theory to any one unit. Since in any case only two, as a
minimum, are required, only two would be available for special status. As
it happens we can assign special status to two grammatical units by re-
ference to other levels on a "more/less" basis. There will always be one
unit which, more than any other, offers itself as an item for contextual
statement because it does the language work in situations: so it might as
well always have the same name: "sentence." There will be another unit,
always lower in rank, which more than any other (but again not ex-
c/usit•ely) enters into another type of pattern and thus offers itself as an
item for lexical statement ;28 this we may as well always call the "word." So,
in grammatical theory, all languages have at least two units; in description,
all languages have sentences and all languages have words-but the
"sentenceness" of the sentence and the "wordness" of the word do not
derive from the theory of grammar.
Various names are available for those above, below or in between when
they turn up. For English, for the two units between sentence and word the
terms "clause" and "phrase" are generally used. It is at the rank of the
about 7) for "regressive .. structures, while allowing "progressive" structures to be in-
finitely expanded (p. 21), they do represent very different types of "infiniteness," and are
separately accounted for in the present theory, the former with, the latter without,
rank shift. This determines the nature, but does not restrict the usc, of the perfectly
valid arbitrary limit on delicacy which the grammar can set in each case without loss of
comprehensiveness.
::1 Such as the status of "being the smallest."
2R Cf. below, 8. The item for lexical statement is not to be identified on the grammatical
rank scale; nor is it a ··unit" at all in the sense in which the term is here used in grammar,
since this use presupposes a rank scale (as well as the other terms "structure," "class,"
and "system" in a system of related categories), which is absent from texis. It is probably
better to restrict the term "unit" to grammar and phonology: cf. C. E. Bazell, "Lin-
guistic Form" (Istanbul, University Press, 1953, p. 11)-though Bazell does not here
consider lexical form.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
CATEGORIES OF THE THEORY OF GRAMMAR 253
phrase that there is most confusion-because there are here the greatest
difficulties-in the description of English; one reason is that in English this
unit carries a fundamental "class" division (see below, 5), so fundamental
that it is useful to have two names for this unit in order to be able to talk
about it: I propose to call it the "group," but to make a class distinction
within it between "group" and "phrase." Below the word, English has one
unit, called by the general name for the unit of lowest rank, the "mor-
pheme." 29
So in the description of English the sentence3o consists of one or more
complete clauses, the clause of one or more complete groups, the group of
one or more complete words and the word of one or more complete
morphemes. The descriptive meaning of "consists of," and the possibilities
of rank shift (including recursive rank shift), are stated as and where
applicable. One distinction that is often useful is between a member of a
unit that consists of only one member of the unit next below and one that
consists of more than one; the former may be called "simple" and the latter
"compound," but if this is done the terms must be kept rigorously to this,
and no other, use.3t
3.4. The theory requires that each unit should be fully identifiable in de-
scription. This means that, if the description is textual, every item of the
text is accounted for at all ranks, through the various links of the "ex-
ponence" chain which involve, of course, the remaining theoretical
29 So, for the description of English:
UNITS
A
I
RAI'K
I
(;~~~=:~phrase)
word
morpheme
3o Statistical work on grammar may yield a further unit, above the sentence: it will then
be possible to set up sentence classes, and account for sequences of them, by reference
to this higher unit. Similarly in phonology we need a unit in English above the tone
group to account for sequences of different tones. The grammatical and phonological
"paragraph" (and perhaps "paraphone?") is probably within reach of a team of lin-
guist, statistician, programmer, and computer; cf. Firth, "Synopsis," p. 18 "Attention
must first be paid to the longer elements of text-such as the paragraph ... "; Zellig S.
Harris, "Discourse Analysis" (Language 28 (i, iv)); for Hill, and others, this is "stylistics"
(A. A. Hill, llllroduction to Linguistic Struclllres, p. 406), but in the present theory it would
come within exactly the same general framework of categories.
31 The "simple/compound" opposition is thus one of structure. It may, of course,
happen that a given realization yields simple membership all the way up and down the
rank scale. Yes may be (i.e. may be an exponent of) one sentence which is one clause
which is one group which is one word which is one morpheme.
~
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
254 M. A. K. HALLIDAY
categories. If the description is exemplificatory, exactly the same is implied,
except that the description proceeds from category to exponent instead of
from exponent to category.
It will be clear from the discussion in the next sections that there can be
no question of independent identification of the exponents of the different
units, since criteria of any given unit always involve reference to others,
and therefore indirectly to all the others. A clause can only be identified as
a clause if a sentence can be identified as a sentence and a group as a
group, and so on up and down the line. For this reason description is not
and can never be unidirectional: it is essential to "shunt," and "shunting"
is a descriptive method that is imposed on description by theory.
STRUCTURE
4.1. The unit being the category of pattern-carrier, what is the nature of the
patterns it carries? In terms once again of language as activity, and there-
fore in linear progression, the patterns take the form of the repetition of
like events. Likeness, at whatever degree of abstraction, is of course a cline,
ranging from "having everything in common" to "having nothing in
common." The commonplace that no two events are ever identical, that the
same thing can never happen twice, is of no relevance whatever to lin-
guistics; as soon as description starts, however little the generalization in-
volved, absolute identity is a necessary hypothesis, which is then built into
the theory, as one endpoint of the likeness cline. Likeness, including
absolute identity, is of course redefined for each level and each category.
In grammar the category set up to account for likeness between events in
successivity is the "structure." 32 If the relation between events in succes-
sivity is "syntagmatic," the structure is the highest abstraction of patterns
of syntagmatic relations. The scale used for talking about it, and for its
graphic display, will most naturally be the orthographic scale: to those of
us brought up on the roman alphabet this happens to run horizontally from
left to right, which is enough reason for adopting this version of the scale.
But, as in the case of the unit, it must be stressed that linear progression
itself is a feature of substance. A structure is made up of "elements" which
are graphically represented as being in linear progression; but the theore-
tical relation among them is one of "order." Order may, but does not
necessarily, have as its realization "sequence," the formal relation carried
32 Cf. Firth, "Synopsis," esp. pp. 17, 30, and "Structural Linguistics," esp. pp. 89,91;
Robins, "Formal Divisions in Sundanese" (Transactions of the Philological Society
1953), p. 109: my, "The Language of the Chinese 'Secret History of the Mongols'"
Publications of the Philological Society 17 (Oxford, Blackwell, 1959), p. 49.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
CATEGORIES OF THE THEORY OF GRAMMAR 255
by linear progression; sequence is at a lower degree of abstraction than
order and is one possible formal exponent of itY
4.2. A structure is thus an arrangement of elements ordered in "places."
Places are distinguished by order alone: a structure XXX consists of three
places. Different elements, on the other hand, are distinguished by some
relation other than that of order: a structure XYZ consists of three
elements which are (and must be, to form a structure) place-ordered,
though they can be listed (X, Y, Z) as an inventory of elements making up
the particular structure.34 A structure is always a structure of a given unit.
33 Cf. Firth, "Synopsis," p. 17: "Elements of structure ... share a mutual expectancy
in an order which is not merely a sequence." Since sequence is a variable, and may or
may not be an exponent of structure, we find difference in sequence without difference
in structure (cf. below, 4.3 n. 42), or difference in structure without difference in sequence.
I am indebted to J. M. Sinclair for a recent conversational example of the latter:
orthographically, "The man came(,) from the Gas Board." Phonologically (relevant
units: "tone group," bounded by//, and "foot," by /-these are unit boundaries and
have nothing to do with juncture): what was said was (tonic syllable underlined):
II I the/man/came//1 from the/Gas/Board//
Grammatically, one clause, structure SP; exponent of P "came," of S "the man ...
from the Gas Board," being a nominal group, structure MH + Q. What might have been
said was
I I 1 the/man/came from the/Gas/Board/ I
Grammatically, one clause, structure SPA; exponents, S "the man", P "came", A "from
the Gas Board". The two arc different in grammatical structure, and this difference has
its exponent in phonic substance which can be stated phonologically. (That the phono-
logical patterns, and the distinction between them, abstracted from the substance along
one dimension correspond regularly (though not one/one) with the grammatical patterns,
and the distinction between them, abstracted along another dimension from the same
substance can be shown by the construction of other partially like clauses.) But though
the difference in structure has its manifestation in substance (there can of course be
ambiguity in substance, as in Hockett's "old men and women", "Two Models" p. 390n.),
in form the difference is not realized in sequence. In sequence, "from the Gas Board"
occupies the same place in both instances; in order, Sand A stand in different relations
to P, and "from the Gas Board" is exponent of (part of) S in the one case and of (the
whole of) A in the other.
Sequence is presumably always manifested in phonic substance as linear progres-
sion; the distinction is then one of exponence, "sequence" being the name for that formal
relation between formal items of which linear progression is the manifestation in
phonic substance.
34 It is useful to make a distinction in the use of symbols between an inventory of
elements of a structure and a structure, by the use of commas in the former. Thus,
X, Y, Z is an inventory of elements, XYZ a structure composed of these elements.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
256 M. A. K. HALLIDAY
Each unit may display a range of possible structures, and the only theore-
tical restriction is that each unit must carry at least one structure that
consists of more than one place.35
Each place and each element in the structure of a given unit is defined
with reference to the unit next below. Each place is the place of operation
of one member of the unit next below, considered as one occurrence. Each
element represents the potentiality of operation of a member of one
grouping of members of the unit next below, considered as one item-
grouping.36 It follows from this that the lowest unit has no structure;37 if it
carried structure, there would be another unit below it.
4.3. In description, structures are stated as linear arrangements of symbols,
each symbol (occurrence) standing for one place and each different symbol
(item) standing for one element. Since elements of structure "exist" only at
this degree of abstraction, the relation "stands for" means simply "is
shorthand for," like that of an initial: '"U' stands for 'United'." In a few
cases traditional names exist which can usefully serve as names for elements
of structure, with the initial letter as the descriptive symbol. In the state-
ment of English clause structure, for example, four elements are needed,
35 Since a unit that carried only one-place structures would be unnecessary: if, for
example, all words consist of one morpheme (i.e. the unit "word" has no structure
containing more than one place), "word" and "morpheme" would be one and the same
unit.
36 For the name and nature of this grouping, see below, 5.
37 Since the morpheme (i) is a grammatical unit and (ii) carries no grammatical
structure, it has no structure. Cf. Palmer, "Linguistic Hierarchy," pp. 229-230 (quoting
Hockett, Manual of Phonology, p. 15): "'Morphemes are not composed of phonemes at
all. Morphemes are indivisible units. A given morpheme is represented by a certain more
or less compact arrangement of phonologic material ... If we call any such representa-
tion a morph, then it becomes correct to say that a morph has a phonological structure-
that it consists of an arrangement of phonemes'. (Hockett) recognizes that the units
established at each level differ in kind, and not merely in size, from those established at
other levels." The "morph" does indeed accommodate the theoretical point (but cf.
below, 10.1 n. 83), that the units differ in kind; but in accepting Hockett's view Palmer
has not noted that, since they differ in kind, "size" cannot be abstracted as common to
the two dimensions of abstraction for them to differ in. That is, a grammatical unit can
only be exponentially coextensive (or not) with a phonological one: when it is, this is a
descriptive accident for which the linguist can be thankful (cf. reference to Allen in
7.1 n. 64 below), but the grammar cannot be made to define the units for phonological
statement (cf. the example in 4.1 n. 33 above, where two exponents of the same gram-
matical unit "clause" may be (systemically contrasted by being) coextensive either with
one tone group or with two). And, even though we may use the categories of "unit" and
"structure" both in grammar and in phonology, these are not shown to be comparable
unless the two theories have the same system of primitive terms with the same inter-
relations.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
CATEGORIES OF THE THEORY OF GRAMMAR 257
for which the widely accepted terms "subject," "predicator," "comple-
ment," and "adjunct" are appropriate. 38 These yield four distinct symbols,
so that S, P, C, A would be the inventory of elements of English clause
structure. All clause structures can then be stated as combinations of these
four in different places: SAPA, ASP, SPC, ASPCC, etc. For one type of
group we have the names "modifier," "head," "qualifier," giving an in-
ventory M, H, Q: here, if the total range of possible structures is H, MH,
HQ, MHQ, these possibilities ·can be stated in a single formula, where
parentheses indicate "may or may not be present," as (M) H (Q).39
In other cases, no names come ready to hand; names can be imported or
coined, or arbitrary symbols chosen-colours, for example, have ad-
vantages over letters in presentation, though there are not enough of them
and they have to be re-defined in description for each unit. It is tempting
sometimes to derive the symbols from the name given to the grouping of
members of the unit next below which operates at the given element (as if
one were to put V instead of P because what operates at P is the verbal
group); but it is important to avoid identifying this grouping, which belongs
to a different category as well as a different rank, with the element itself-
therefore if this method is to be used at all it must be used all the time and
a statement made to cover it.40
There are some instances where an element of structure is identified as
such solely by reference to formal sequence: where the element is defined by
place stated as absolute or relative position in sequence. It is useful to
indicate that here sequence is so to speak built in to structure, and this can
be shown by an arrow placed over the symbols for the elements concerned.
38 As used by Hill, Linguistic Structures, pp. 256 If. The "definitions" of these terms
(i.e. the categories themselves) are of course different, since the theory differs from Hill's.
Cf. below, 10.6.
39 This formulaic presentation is useful as a generalized statement of an inventory of
possible structures: a list H, MH, HQ, HMQ can be generalized as (M)H(Q). This par-
ticular instance is an oversimplification, since there may be more than one exponent of
M and Q: the formula would then read (M ...
0 )H(Q ...
0 ), where ... n allows infinite
progression (not regression).
40 The real point is to avoid taking two distinct theoretical steps at once. As said below
(5), the relation of "class" to "structure" is such that a class of a given unit stands in
one/one relation to an element of structure of the unit next above: thus, the exponent of
the element P in the structure of the unit "clause" is the class "verbal" of the unit
"group". We could-provided we did so consistently-replace the symbol P here by V,
thus conflating two statements. But not only are there descriptive reasons for not doing
so (cf. below, 5.4); it is theoretically invalid, since two sets of relations are involved
(element of clause structure to unit "clause," class of group to unit "group"), and if the
two steps are taken at once the crucial relation of structure to class on the rank scale
is obscured.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
258 M. A. K. HALLIDAY
For example, in English clause structure it is a crucial criterion of the
element S that it precedes P in sequence: structures can be stated as
SPCA, sAP A, ASP etc.41 This displays the contrast between this situation,
where Sis crucially defined by position relative toP, and realized sequences
of elements which are not however defined by sequence, which may be
indicated by simple linearity of the symbols. 42
4.4. In the consideration of the places and elements of structure of each
unit, which of course vary from language to language and from unit to·
unit within a language, a new scale enters, that of "delicacy" (see below,
7 .4). This is depth of detail, and is a cline running from a fixed point at one
end (least delicate, or "primary") to that undefined but theoretically
crucial point (probably statistically definable) where distinctions are so fine
that they cease to be distinctions at all, like a river followed up from the
mouth, each of whose tributaries ends in a moorland bog. Primary struc-
tures are those which distinguish the minimum number of elements
necessary to account comprehensively for the operation in the structure of
the given unit of members of the unit next below: necessary, that is, for the
identification of every item at all ranks. (M)H(Q), and the various pos-
sible combinations of S, P, C, A, are primary structures: one cannot
account for all words in group structure, or all groups in clause structure,
with fewer than these elements or places.
Subsequent more delicate differentiations are then stated as "secondary"
structures. These are still structures of the same unit, not of the unit next
below; they take account of finer distinctions recognizable at the same
rank. 43 Rank and delicacy are different scales of abstraction: primary group
41 If, instead, an inventory of elements is stated first, the arrow can be added (where it
really belongs) in the inventory: s-;P, C, A. It is then no longer required in the statement
of structures, since it is presupposed.
42 Cf. above, 4.1. In a Latin clause of structure SOP (O=object), sequence plays no
part in the definition of the elements: so no arrow. But rearrangements of the elements,
to give SPO, OSP etc., can be usefully employed to state the more delicate distinctions
between "puer puellam amat," "puellam puer amat" etc. In English, where SP sequence
is crucial to the definition of S (though various arrangements of C and A are possible),
more delicate grammatical distinctions, such as those carried by intonation, must be
shown secondarily.
43 For example the following two exponents of the (class) nominal (of the unit) group:
all the ten houses on the riverside
and
the finest old houses on the riverside
have the same primary structure M .. HQ (or MMMHQ). But a more delicate statement
of M, still at group rank, shows distinct secondary structures, the first example having
DaDbO, the second DbOE.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
CATEGORIES OF THE THEORY OF GRAMMAR 259
structures differ in rank from primary clause structures, but are at the same
degree of delicacy; while primary and secondary clause structures differ in
delicacy but not in rank.
As the description increases in delicacy the network of grammatical re-
lations becomes more complex. The interaction of criteria makes the re-
lation between categories, and between category and exponent, increasingly
one of "more/less" rather than "either/or." It becomes necessary to weight
criteria and to make statements in terms of probabilities. With more
delicate secondary structures, different combinations of elements, and their
relation to groupings of the unit next below, have to be stated as more and
less probable.44 The concept of "most delicate grammar," and its relation
to lexis, is discussed below (see 6.3 and 7.4); but the "more/less" relation
itself, far from being an unexpected complication in grammar, is in fact a
basic feature of language and is treated as such by the theory. It is not
simply that all grammar can be stated in probability terms, based on
frequency counts in texts: this is due to the nature of a text as a sample.
But the very fact that we can recognize primary and secondary structures-
that there is a scale of delicacy at all-shows that the nature of language is
not to operate with relations of "always this and never that." Grammatical
theory takes this into account by introducing a special scale, that of deli-
cacy, to handle the improbability of certainty; this frees the rest of the
theory from what would otherwise be the weakening effect of this feature
of language. The category of structure, for example, is the more powerful
because it can be used to state the patterns of a given unit comprehensively
at the primary degree without the assumption that it has accounted for all
the facts.
CLASS
5.1. The structure is set up to account for likeness between events of the
same rank, and it does so by referring them to the rank next below. To one
place in structure corresponds one occurrence of the unit next below, and
at each element operates one grouping of members of the unit next below.
44 When Hockett writes (Manual of Phonology, p. 17). "In general, then, if we find
continuous-scale contrasts in the vicinity of what we are sure is language, we exclude
them from language (though not from culture)," this applies (i) only to grammar and
phonology, not to Iexis or context (cf. Bazell, "Linguistic Form," p. 11), and (ii) only to
one type of contrast, that between terms in systems. It is, indeed, a defining characteristic
of a system that it cannot be a cline. But units and classes are not crucially discrete: in
exponence, units display syntagmatic non-discreteness (syncretism); classes, paradig-
matic non-discreteness (statable in various ways, such as multidimensional classifica-
tion, assignment of an item to different classes with variable probability etc.).
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
260 M.A. K. HALLIDAY
This means that there will be certain groupings of members of each unit
identified by restriction on their operation in structure. The fact that it is
not true that anything can go anywhere in the structure of the unit above
itself is another aspect of linguistic patterning, and the category set up to
account for it is the "class."
The class is that grouping of members of a given unit which is defined by
operation in the structure of the unit next above. It accounts for a "para-
digmatic" relation, being a grouping of items "at risk" under certain con-
ditions. It is related primarily to elements of structure: the first degree of
classification yields classes which stand in one/one relation to elements of
primary structures, and these we may call "primary classes."
5.2. Class, like structure, is variable in delicacy. Clearly, in the first place,
more delicate classes are the product of more delicate structures: in fact,
"secondary" classes are derived from structure in two ways. Firstly the
same element at different places in structure may yield distinct secondary
classes. If a given unit has primary structures XY, XYZ, YZ, and XYZY,
the primary classes of the unit next below are "class operating at X" "class
operating at Y" and "class operating at Z." If however there is a further
restriction such that in XYZY, which will now be (secondarily) rewritten
XY.ZYb, only a section of the members of the class at Y can operate at Y.
and only another section (not necessarily mutually exclusive) at Yb, this
yields as secondary classes "class operating at Y." and "class operating at
Yb."
Secondly, with increased delicacy the elements of primary structure will
be differentiated into secondary elements. A primary structure generalized
as X ... n YZ, of which XXXXYZ is an instance, shows a generalized re-
lation of X to (say) Y; but there may be internal relations within X ... n
such that XXXX is rewritten pqrs. These will yield secondary classes "class
operating at p," "class operating at q," etc.
In the second place, more delicate classes appear whenever a restriction
is found which differentiates among the members of a primary class. There
may be a relation of mutual determination, or "concord," between two
classes; each divides into two sections such that a member of one section
of one class is always accompanied by a member of one section of the other
class. Thus if the primary class at X is 1 and that at Y is 2, a structure XY
must have as its exponent either 1.1 + 2.1 or 1.2 + 2.2. Secondary classes
arrived at in this way in description may be referred to distinctively as
"sub-classes," to indicate that they are derived by differentiation from
primary classes without reference to secondary structures; but it is im-
portant to state that there is no theoretical difference here. The relation
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
CATEGORIES OF THE THEORY OF GRAMMAR 261
between structure and class is a two-way relation, and there is no question
of "discovering" one "before" the other. In any given instance there may
be descriptive reasons for stating the one without the other; but all
structures presuppose classes and all classes presuppose structures.
5.3. What is theoretically determined is the relation between structure and
class on the one hand and unit on the other. Class, like structure, is linked
to unit: a class is always a class of (members of) a given unit: and the
class-structure relation is constant-a class is always defined with reference
to the structure of the unit next above, and structure with reference to
classes of the unit next below. A class is not a grouping of members of a
given unit which are alike in their own structure. In other words, by re-
ference to the rank scale, classes are derived "from above" (or "down-
wards") and not "from below" (or "upwards").
The distinction between downward and upward movement on the rank
scale is important in grammar, but it is a mistake to raise it to the status
of a choice between different theories, which it is not. The "formal/
functional" dichotomy is one of those which linguistics is better rid of;45 it
is misleading to say even that classes are functionally determined, since
they are set up with reference to the form of the unit next above-the
whole description is both formal and functional at the same time, and
"function" is merely an aspect of form. The distinction does however need
a name, and this seems the best use for the terms "syntax" and "morpho-
logy." Traditionally these terms have usually referred to "grammar above
the word" (syntax) and "grammar below the word" (morphology); but
this distinction has no theoretical status.46 It has a place in the description
of certain languages, "inflexional" languages 47 which tend to display one
kind of grammatical relation above the word ("free" items predominating)
45 I would class it with other dichotomies that Firth rejects: cf. "Papers," p. 227, "My
own approach to meaning in linguistics has always been independent of such dualisms as
mind and body, language and thought, word and idea, signifiant et signifie, expression
and content. These dichotomies are a quite unnecessary nuisance, and in my opinion
should be dropped." Cf. "Applications," pp. 2, 3-though here, I must admit, Firth also
rejects "form and substance," which I find crucial (as levels) to an understanding of how
language works.
46 Cf. Firth, "Synopsis," p. 14: "It follows that the distinction between morphology
and syntax is perhaps no longer useful or convenient in descriptive linguistics."
47 i.e. languages in which inflexional systems are a regular feature of word structure.
"Free" and "bound" are generalized class categories, linked to the generalized structure
categories of "simple" and "compound" (above, 2.3): "free" is "able to stand as ex-
ponent of one-element structure of the unit next above," "bound" is "unable to stand,
etc." A member of a "free" class can thus be exponent of a "simple" structure, while
a member of a bound class can operate only in "compound" structures.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
262 M.A. K. HALLIDAY
and another below the word ("bound" items predominating). But it seems
worth while making use of "syntax" and "morphology" in the theory, to
refer to direction on the rank scale. "Syntax" is then the downward rela-
tion, "morphology" the upward one; and both go all the way. We can then
say, simply, classes are syntactical and not morphological. .ts
(A terminological alternative is to talk of "syntactic classes" and
"morphological classes," but this has the disadvantage that it destroys the
consistency in the use of the term "class," no longer restricting it to a
category of unique theoretical status. When a name is needed for morpho-
logical groupings, groupings of items on the basis of likeness in their own
structure, the term "paradigm" is available.49)
5.4. In description the term "class" covers primary and secondary classes.
It is often unnecessary to specify; but it is useful to state primary classes
first, since these form the link between elements of structure and more
delicate classes.5° For the different classes of each unit, many names are
available, especially at word rank-though it is precisely the long history
of terms like "verb" and "noun" which reinforces their need for rigorous
redefinition in the theory. In other cases names can often be found,
48 Other terms are of course available, like Haas' "synthetic classification" and "ana-
lytic classification" (W. Haas: "On defining linguistic units," Transactions of the
Philological Society, 1954, pp. 68 ff.). The terminological objection to the use of "class"
in both (as in "form class" and "function class") is however theoretically founded: if we
say, with Haas (p. 68), that "we distinguish two ways of classifying" linguistic units, we
imply two things, (i) a choice of (ii) procedural direction. But this is not a procedural
matter, and there is no choice. All forms are to be accounted for, and this means stating
both their class (linking them to the unit next above) and their own structure (linking
them to the unit next below). Whether the "syntactic" groupings, of items operating
alike in the structure of the units next above, and the "morphological" groupings, of
items alike in their own structure, coincide or not is a descriptive variable; other things
being equal, a form of description will be chosen in which they do, since the more they
coincide the more grammatical the statement. But they must be terminologically per-
mitted not to coincide without prejudice to their both being stated. Cf. Robins, "Status
of grammar," p. 109: "When there is a conflict of classification by morphological
paradigm and syntactic function, the latter is given preference in assigning words to
word classes"-! would add "groups to group classes, etc."
49 E.g. in the structure of the English verbal group, the words "work," "play" operate
at the same element: they are members of the same word class. The words "works,"
"working," "worked" do not operate at the same element: they are not members of the
same word class. They have themselves, however, the same (primary) structure: they are
members of the same paradigm. Likewise in the structure of that class of the word con-
taining the words "worked," "played," the morphemes "work," "play" operate at the
same element: they are members of the same morpheme class.
so More delicate classes derived from secondary structures are referable both as ex-
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
CATEGORIES OF THE THEORY OF GRAMMAR 263
especially where structural restrictions permit class identification between
units: if certain word classes only (or predominantly) operate in one class
of group and others only in another, one can talk of "verbal group" and
"verb" (="verb word"), "nominal group" and "noun (word)" and so on.
At the same time it is safer not to allow complete terminological identity be-
tween units: "verb" alone should not serve as the name both for a class of
group and for a class of word.
In the use of symbols for classes, figures have the advantage of avoiding
confusion with elements of structure. This is not only theoretically desir-
able, because of their different status; it has descriptive value in that the
theoretical one/one relation between elements and classes allows for in-
stances where two different elements of structure, standing in different
relation to each other or to a third, yield primary classes the membership
of which is coextensive: these then form a single primary class derivable
simultaneously from two elements of structure.s 1 If letters are used for
elements of structure, and figures for classes, the relation between the two
can be demonstrated by the use of a colour code.
Highest
abstraction
SCALE OF
EXPONENCE
SYSTEM
6.1. Up to this point the theory has accounted for three aspects of formal
patterning: the varying stretches that carry patterns, the ordered repetition
of like events that makes up the patterns and the grouping of like events
-------------------------------------------------------------
ponents to secondary structures and as subdivisions (same degree of exponence, but
more delicate) to primary classes. Diagrammatically:
SCALE OF DELICACY
Least delicate Most delicate
+--------------------+
Primary Secondary
structure ------+structure
I I
t t
Primary Secondary
class ~class
Data
51 Or nearly coextensive: the criteria for the setting up of one primary class or two are
descriptive. For example, in English clause structure S and C are different elements
standing in different relation to P. There is a high degree of overlap between their ex-
ponents: one primary class (class "nominal" of unit "group") can be set up as exponent
of both S and C. The lack of exact coextensiveness will be stated by secondary elements
and classes, to account for (for example) the occurrence of "the old hall," "the old
town," "the old town hall," "this hall/town/town hall is old," "this is a hall/town/town
hall," and the non-occurrence of "this old is a hall," "this is an old," or "this hall is
town."
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
264 M.A.K.HALLIDAY
by their occurrence in patterns. What remains to be accounted for is the
occurrence of one rather than another from among a number of like events.
The category set up for this purpose is the "system." 52 This falls under
the general definition of system given above (2.1). But this does not yet
state its place in grammatical theory, its relation to the other fundamental
categories.
The class is a grouping of items identified by operation in structure: that
is, what enters into grammatical relations of structure is not the item itself
considered as a formal realization 53 but the class, which is not a list of formal
items but an abstraction from them. By increase in delicacy, the primary
class is broken down into secondary classes of the same rank. This set of
secondary classes now stands in the relation of exponent to an element of
primary structure of the unit next above.
This gives a system of classes. If class l is the primary class (say of the
group) operating at X in (clause) structure, and this has secondary classes
l.l, 1.2, and 1.3, then 1.1, 1.2, and 1.3 form a system of classes operating
at X. X is now shown to presuppose a choice-a choice that is implied by
the nature of the class (as a grouping of items) but that is displayed first
still in abstraction, by reference to the category of class itself. 54
6.2. Systems of secondary classes thus allow the description to remain at a
high degree of abstraction while displaying at each step, each increase in
delicacy, a more finely differentiated range of choice. This is the value of
the concept of "sub-class" (above, 5.2), since wherever a choice among a
52 Cf. Firth, "Papers," p. 144: "Various systems are to be found in speech activity and
when stated must adequately account for such activity. Science sho.uld not impose
systems on languages, it should look for systems in speech activity, and, having found
them, state the facts in a suitable language." Cf. also references given in 4.1 n 32, above.
53 Again, abstraction on the exponence scale. The formal item "the old man" is ex-
ponent of (is a member of) a class ("nominal," of the unit "group"). The class "nominal
group" is exponent of (operates at the place of) an element of structure (S or C, of the
unit "clause"). The formal item itself, of course, has its own (and ultimate) exponents in
phonic or graphic substance.
54 Diagrammatically (axes as in 5.4 n. 50, above):
Primary structure
XYZY
Secondary structures
XYaZYc and
XYbZ Yc
""I
"" "" 1 (at X) .,.
::E
~ 2.1 (at Ya)
2 (at Y)
!i; 2.2 (at Yb)
3 (at Z)
~ 2.3 (at Yc)
Primary classes
Secondary classes
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
CATEGORIES OF THE THEORY OF GRAMMAR 265
finite number of mutually exclusive possibilities is found to occur within a
class one can recognize a system whose terms have the nature and degree
of abstraction of the "class:" their relation to secondary elements of
structure is implied but need not be stated.
Thus the system provides what is, in the order in which the categories
are presented here, the final requisite for the linking of the categories to the
data. 55 Through the system, in one of two ways (below, 6.3), the description
can now account for the formal exponents, the items identified in lin-
guistic form-and through them is linked, by description at other levels, to
the ultimate exponents in substance. But there is a crucial point here. Any
category can be linked directly to its exponents :56 a given formal item can
be at one and the same time, and in the same sense, an exponent of a unit,
a structure, an element of structure, a class, and a term in a system. 57 At the
same time the aim of grammar is to stay in grammar: to account for as
much as can possibly be accounted for grammatically, by reference to the
categories of grammatical theory. This, since it implies maximum genera-
lization and abstraction, means that one proceeds from category to ex-
ponent by the longest route that is compatible with never going over the
same step twice.
55 As already stressed (above, 2.2), the order of presentation here is for convenience of
exposition; the relations among the theoretical categories do not involve logical pre-
cedence.
56 Since the categories are set up precisely to account for the data that are stated as
their exponents, this is not surprising. Cf. Firth, "Synopsis," p. 1: "A theory derives its
usefulness and validity from the aggregate of experience to which it must continually
refer in renewal of connexion." The relation of category to exponent can be generalized
as one of abstraction; one endpoint of this relation may be any one of four categories,
but there is no scale of abstraction among the categories-their relation to each other is
such that the move from any category to its exponent may be made either directly or via
any or all of the other categories. As said below (6.2), the route may involve rank shift;
but this does not mean that rank is to be equated with exponence or that there is any
distinction between different units as regards the kind or degree of their relation to their
exponents. (That is to say, even if one chooses to move from "clause" to exponent via
"group," this does not mean that the group is in any sense "nearer" to the data than the
clause: indeed, the move from clause to exponent via group presupposes the possibility
of moving from group to exponent via clause.)
57 So, for example, the formal item "were driven" may be exponent of: (i) the unit
"group," (ii) the element Pin structure, (iii) the class "verbal," and (iv) the term"passive"
in a system of secondary classes. All these statements are interdependent: the link of ex-
ponent to each theoretical category depends on its link to all the others and on their own
interrelations in the theory. Thus the unit "group" is linked to the structure of the
"clause;" the class "verbal" is a class of the unit "group" and is linked to the elements of
structure of the clause; the system "voice" has as terms classes of the verbal group; these
classes have their own structures, etc.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
266 M.A.K.HALLIDAY
Here it is important to avoid theoretical confusion between the scales of
exponence and rank. Since the relation of class to structure is syntactical
(as defined above, 5.3), if one derives classes from structures then "remain-
ing in grammar" means moving step by step down the rank scale until the
lowest unit is reached. 58 So it might appear as if going down the rank scale
is the same thing as going down the exponence scale. But it is not. The
sentence stands in exactly the same relation to its exponents as does the
morpheme; one can move over (at right angles, so to speak) at any rank,
and the categories of class, structure, and system remain at the same degree
of abstraction whatever unit they are associated with. The deriving of class
from structure is of course merely one way of stating a theoretical relation
which could equally be viewed from the other end ;59 in this case "remaining
in grammar" would mean going up the rank scale and it would appear
(equally erroneously) that it was only at the rank of the sentence that one
reached the exponents.
6.3. There comes a point, however, when one is forced out to the exponents;
and this happens in one of two ways. In the first case the description yields
a system in which the formal exponents themselves operate as terms. Here
we have gone all the way in grammar; the formal items are grammatically
contrastive (and do not belong in the dictionary60). In the second case the
description yields a class where no further breakdown by grammatical
categories is possible, a class whose exponents make up an open set. Here
we must leave grammar; the relations between the exponents must be
accounted for as lexical relations.
Neither of these endpoints of grammar is restricted to the rank of any
one unit. The exit to lexis tends to be associated predominantly-but prob-
ably never uniquely-with one unit, which for this reason is called in
description the "word" (above, 3.3). The system of exponents also tends
to operate at the lower end of the rank scale; but this, although predictable
as economy of resources, is not a theoretical restriction: the rank distribu-
58 Thus:
Units:
sentence
structures ... )
clause
(system of) classes . . . exponents
structures ...
" group
(system of) classes ...
etc.
etc.
59 Without in any way affecting the syntactic nature of the "class".
60 Cf. Paul Garvin, in Georgetown University Monograph Series No.9, 1957, p. 55:
"Morphemes of limited membership class should be listed in the grammar and mor-
phemes which belong to classes of unlimited membership should be exemplified in the
grammar and listed in the dictionary."
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
CATEGORIES OF THE THEORY OF GRAMMAR 267
tion of formal exponents in systems is a descriptive feature which, in a five-
unit description, may be expected to involve at any rate the three lower
units.
The theoretical place of the move from grammar to lexis is therefore not
a feature of rank61 but one of delicacy. It is defined theoretically as the place
where increase in delicacy yields no further systems; this means that in
description it is constantly shifting as delicacy increases. The grammarian's
dream is (and must be, such is the nature of grammar) of constant terri-
torial expansion. He would like to turn the whole of linguistic form into
grammar, hoping to show that lexis can be defined as "most delicate
grammar." The exit to lexis would then be closed, and all exponents ranged
in systems. No description has yet been made so delicate that we can test
whether there really comes a place where increased delicacy yields no
further systems: relations at this degree of delicacy can only be stated
statistically, and serious statistical work in grammar has hardly begun. It
may well be that the nature of language is such that this "most delicate
grammar" will evaporate in distinctions which are so slenderly statistical
that the system has, in effect, been replaced by the open set. For the
moment it seems better to treat lexical relations, where even the identifica-
tion of the items concerned by grammatical means is extremely complex, as
on a different level, and to require a different theory to account for them.
6.4. A brief illustration, from English grammar, of the four fundamental
categories. The exponent of the element S in primary clause structure is the
primary class "nominal" of the unit "group." The primary structure of the
nominal group is (M ... n)H{Q ... n). The primary classes of the unit
"word" operating at H and M are respectively the noun and the pre-noun.
The element M can be broken down into secondary structures composed
of any combination of the elements D, 0, E in that order, whose exponents
are the secondary classes "deictic," "numerative," and "adjective" of the
word. Deictics include a number of systems whose terms are the formal
exponents themselves, with further secondary classes separating, for
example, "all/both/such/half" {class 1, at Da) from "a/the/some etc."
{class 2, at Db) and various sub-classes involving concord. Adjectives like-
wise include a number of secondary classes, but in most of these the
61 Except in the sense that the description will always try a move down the rank scale
as a possible way of extending its power ("remaining in grammar"). But wherever the
lexical item is greater than a morpheme, its further analysis by grammar into morphemes
will leave its lexical relations unaccounted for. For example, in "the train left ten
minutes late, but made it up," "made up" is a discontinuous verbal group analyzed as
two words, one ("made") oftwo morphemes, the other simple; but it enters into an open
set qua lexical item "make up," which itself is here assigned to no grammatical unit.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
268 M.A. K. HALLIDAY
exponents form open sets, and for further treatment of these grammar
hands over to lexis. 62
RANK, EXPONENCE, AND DELICACY
7.1. In relating the categories to each other and to their exponents, the
theory needs to operate with three scales of abstraction, the scales of rank,
exponence, and delicacy. These need to be kept apart from each other, and
also from two other things: regressive structures, 63 which are handled in the
description by rank shift, and the range of levels by which grammar is
distinguished from other aspects of language in the first place.
The separation of levels has been taken as a starting-point, and it is not
the purpose of this paper to explore this part of the theory. My own view
is that, whatever is decided for presentation, which will vary with purpose,
both in theory and in description it is essential to separate the levels first
and then relate them. The theoretical reason is that different kinds of ab-
straction are involved, and therefore different categories. In description, the
attempt to account for the data at all levels at once results in a failure to
account for them fully at any level. If one rejects the separation of levels
and wishes, for example, to combine grammatical and phonological
criteria to yield a single set of units, the description becomes intolerably
complex. The attempt to delimit grammatical units on phonological
criteria in English has recourse to such things as a system of juncture in
which any of the exponents in substance can be an exponent of any of the
terms in the system. The exponents of the phonological unit which carries
contrasts of intonation in English, the "tone group," are in fact not co-
extensive with the exponents of any one or even any two of the grammatical
units: if one describes English grammar with the tone group as a unit, when
it can be exponentially coextensive with every one of what a "monolevel"
grammar would regard as five different units, one fails to show what is in
fact the relation between the grammar and the phonology of the language. 64
62 See below, 8.
63 Regressive structures can of course be regarded as forming a scale; but their de-
scription does not require the introduction of a separate scale into the theory. Cf. above,
3.2 n. 26.
64 Cf. Allen, "Structure and system in the Abaza verbal complex" (Transactions of the
Philological Society 1956), pp. 143-145, from which the following is taken: "It fre-
quently occurs that an appropriate 'bit' of the corresponding phonological statement
(or of the orthography) is used as a label for the grammatical unit in question ... The
price of using such labels is constant vigilance ... Where the phonological analysis per-
mits of alternatives, that alternative is to be chosen which is most congruent with the
grammatical analysis; ... important correspondences may be observed between phono-
logy and grammar, in so far as different phonological systems ... may be required for
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
CATEGORIES OF THE THEORY OF GRAMMAR 269
A meaningful account of how grammar and phonology are related in
English must be based on a prior separate statement of the two. 65
As said above (1.4), it is misleading to think of the levels as forming a
hierarchy. They represent different aspects of the "patternedness" of
linguistic activity. In this respect phonology is an "interlevel," since there
is an added degree of dependence here: the patterns of substance, and those
of form, are each fully definable in their own terms, by internal reference,
so to speak; whereas the patterns of phonology, being the organization of
substance in form, although requiring to be stated separately because of the
distinct nature of the abstractions involved, and the fact that (not surpris-
ingly) the patterns are carried by different stretches of exponents, are only
significant with reference to the two levels of form and substance. Context
is an interlevel in a different sense, since it relates language to something
that is not language; it is an interlevel because it is not with the non-
language activity itself that linguistics is concerned but with the relation of
this to language form. Though there is no precedence or priority, there is of
course order among the levels, as determined by their specific interrela-
tions; and in the study of language as a whole form is pivotal, since it is
through grammar and lexis that language activity is-and is shown to be-
meaningful.
7.2. The scale of rank has been discussed (above, 3) with reference to the
unit, the basic category which operates on this scale. The syntactic ("down-
ward") determination of classes is a feature of the theory, so that with
respect to the category of class the rank scale appears as one of logical pre-
cedence running from highest to lowest unit. But this precedence applies to
class criteria only, so that even in the theory it is not a one-way relation:
the exponents of different grammatical categories-but the relation between them ... is
an indirect one via the phonic data." In spite of the different formulation, and the
difference between Allen's diagrammatic representation and those used here (above,
1.7 n. 10, and below, 10.3 n. 88), I do not think that there is any conflict between Allen's
view and the view put forward here.
65 In which (i) one set of units is set up for grammar, and their structures, classes, and
systems described, and (ii) one set of units is set up for phonology and these also appro-
priately described. Other things being equal, a form of phonological statement will be
preferred which simplifies the statement of the relations between phonology and
grammar. It is here that one asks such questions as: "Is it possible to generalize any
phonological features as recognition signals of a given grammatical category?" and "Is
it possible to specify under what conditions a phonological unit, such as the tone group,
is exponentially coextensive with one or other grammatical unit, such as the clause or
group?"
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
270 M. A. K. HALLIDAY
the theory itself embodies "shunting" (moving up and down the rank scale)
as crucial to the interrelation of the categories. In description, all state-
ments presuppose shunting; the description of the sentence cannot be
complete until the description of the morpheme is complete, and vice versa.
In presentation, of course, procedure varies according to purpose and
scope: downward presentation seems easier to make clear, but this may
well be overridden-for example if grammar is an adjunct to lexical
description, as sometimes in the statistical study of lexis.
Rank is distinct both from exponence and from delicacy. A shift in one
never by itself entails a shift in either of the others. The reason why rank is
often confused with other scales is that there are cases where a shift in rank
does accompany a shift in something else; but this is always by virtue of the
logical relations among the categories involved. The fact that by moving
from structure to class, which is (or can be) a move on the exponence scale,
one also moves one step down the rank scale, is due to the specific relation
between the categories of "class" and "structure," and not to any inherent
interdetermination between exponence and rank. The descriptive relevance
of keeping the scales distinct is that it is important to be able to display
what happens if one shifts on one scale, keeping the other two constant.66
7.3. Exponence is the scale which relates the categories of the theory, which
are categories of the highest degree of abstraction, to the data. 67 Since the
categories stand in different relations to the data, it might seem necessary
to recognize four different scales of exponence, one leading from each
category. In fact, however, exponence can be regarded as a single scale.
66 One may want to compare primary and secondary structures of the same (class of
the same) unit: shift in delicacy only. One may want to compare classes of one unit with
classes of the unit next below: shift in rank only. Or one may want to state and exemplify
the classes of a given unit: shift in exponence only.
67 Cf. Firth, "Synopsis," taken from pp. 15-16: "The term exponent has been intro-
duced to refer to the phonetic and phonological 'shape' of words or parts of words
which are generalized in the categories ... The consideration of graphic exponents is a
companion study to phonological and phonetic analysis ... The phonetic description of
exponents which may be cumulative or discontinuous or both, should provide a direct
justification of the analysis. It may happen that the exponents of some phonological
categories may serve also for syntactical categories. But the exponents of many gram-
matical categories may require ad hoc or direct phonetic description ... The exponents
of the phonological elements of structure and of the ... terms of systems are to be
abstracted from the phonic material ... The exponents of elements of structure and of
terms in systems are always consistent and cannot be mutually contradictory." I would
regard the concept of exponents as one of Firth's major contributions to linguistic theory.
References will be found throughout the writings of Allen and of Carnochan, Eugenie
Henderson, Mitchell, Palmer, Robins, and other linguists of the School of Oriental &
Mrican Studies, London, many of which are referred to elsewhere in this paper.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
CATEGORIES OF THE THEORY OF GRAMMAR 271
In the first place, each category can be linked directly by exponence to
the formal item: it is in fact a requirement of the theory that any descriptive
category should be able to be so linked. This may be stated by way of
exemplification, as when we say "'the old man' is (an example of) an ex-
ponent of S in clause structure." This is however not a description of the
element S, since by relating it to its exponent at a stage when it was not
necessary to do so we should have lost generality ( cf. above, 6.3). So instead
of throwing up the grammatical sponge and moving out to lexis while this
is still avoidable, the description takes successive steps down the exponence
scale, changing rank where necessary, until (at the degree of delicacy
chosen) it is brought unavoidably face to face with the formal item.
In the second place, therefore, the step by step move from any one
category to the data can proceed via any or all of the other categories. This
is then a move down the exponence scale, and at each step, given that
delicacy is constant, one category is replaced by another (either with or
without change of rank, according to which category is replaced by which).
While therefore the categories are distinct, they are interrelated in such a
way that the relation of exponence has the status of a single scale.
The ultimate exponent in form is the formal item. This has then to be
related, in turn, to the substance. But this relationship, though it may also
be called "exponence," entails a new scale, in which the nature of the
abstraction is different and the formal item is now at the other end-it is
itself the abstraction, and is not in any way delimited or categorized by
grammar.68
When grammar reaches the formal item, either it has said all there is
formally to be said about it or it hands over to lexis. The formal item is the
boundary of grammar on the exponence scale. It is not of course the
boundary on the rank scale: whenever the formal item is anything other
than a single morpheme (whether in closed system like "seeing (that),"or
in open set like "pickup") the grammar can be taken further down in rank,
since it can state the structures in terms of elements whose exponents are
words and morphemes. But "seeing (that)" enters into a system at group
68 Strictly speaking the relation of the formal item to its exponent in substance entails
a two-fold relation of abstraction, one of whose dimensions is exponence (and is there-
fore a prolongation of the scale which relates category to formal item). The other dimen-
sion is the abstraction, by likeness, of a "general" event (class of events, though not in
the technical sense in which "class" is used here) from a large number of "particular"
events, the individual events of speech activity. For theoretical purposes the exponence
scale can be regarded as comprehending this dimension of abstraction, which takes place
then in that part of the scale which relates formal item to exponent in substance. Cf.
Firth, "Synopsis," p. 2; "Papers," pp. 144, 187.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
272 M. A. K. HALLIDAY
rank, while "pickup" emerges from the grammar as a word, though being
a lexical item it would not necessarily be an exponent of any whole gram·
matical unit. Once it has been taken over by lexis, the grammatical cate-
gories, and the grammatical exponence scale, no longer impinge on it (see
below, 8.2).
7.4. Delicacy is the scale of differentiation, or depth in detail. It is a cline,
whose limit at one end is the primary degree in the categories of structure
and class. In the theory, the other limit is the point beyond which no further
grammatical relations obtain: where there are no criteria for further
secondary structures, or systems of secondary classes or formal items. In
description, delicacy is a variable: one may choose to describe a language
without going beyond the primary degree, still being comprehensive in
rank and exponence and making use of all the categories of the theory.
Each subsequent increase in delicacy delays the move to the exponents (cf.
above, 7.3) and thus increases the grammaticalness of the description. The
limit of delicacy is set by the means at one's disposal.
In well-described languages, such as English, any extension in delicacy
beyond what is already known requires either or both of large-scale
textual studies with frequency counts and complex secondary classification
based on multiple criteria, criteria which often cut across each other and
may have to be variably weighted. And, as suggested above (6.3), a point
will perhaps be reached where probabilities are so even as to cease to be
significant 69 and classes so delicately differentiated that the description will
have to decide on crucial criteria and ignore the others, 70 thus setting its
own limits.
Delicacy is distinct from rank and the limit of delicacy applies at the
rank of all units, for example differentiation of clause structures and of
classes of the group. At one stage, therefore, it becomes a limit on the
grammatical differentiation of items which then remain to be lexically
differentiated: it sets an endpoint to grammar where lexis takes over. Here
the scales of delicacy and exponence meet. The endpoint set to grammar on
69 For example, the statistical study of sequences of clause classes, which is necessary
both to the statement of sentence structures and to the description of a unit above the
sentence, would reveal the range, and cline, of the determination of probabilities by the
occurrence of a member of each class. (Cf. my (review of) Whatmough: Language: A
Modern Synthesis in Archiuum Linguisticum X.)
70 For example, a preliminary study of about 1,000 items of the "put up" type, the
purpose of which is to reyeal the systems (dimensions) relevant to the identification and
classification of so-called "phrasal verbs" in English, shows that fifteen different formal
criteria yield fifteen different sets of classes.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
CATEGORIES OF THE THEORY OF GRAMMAR 273
the exponence scale is where abstraction ceases: one has to move from
abstract category to exponential item. That set on the delicacy scale is
where differentiation ceases: the set of exponents of each class, and of each
element of structure, permits no further, more delicate groupings. If the
formal items are still not ranged in systems, the implication in either case
is that further relations among them are lexical.
Whether or not, as discussed above (6.3), grammatical delicacy can reach
a point where there is a onejone category-exponent relation (where each
element of structure, and each class, has only one formal item as exponent),
when all formal relations, including those among what are now treated as
lexical items, can be accounted for by the grammatical categories and
stated grammatically-in other words, whether or not, ultimately, all
linguistic form is grammar, we do not know. At present, lexical items must
be treated separately, and lexical relations established in their own right.
These lexical relations do not depend on grammatical categories 71 (so they
are not yet "most delicate grammar") and they have their own dimensions
of abstraction (so not yet "most exponential grammar"). So there must be
a theory oflexis, to account for that part of linguistic form which grammar
cannot handle.
LEXIS
8.1. This section is intended merely to bring lexis into relation with
grammar, not to discuss the theory of lexis as such. As has been pointed
out (above, 3.3. and 6.3), there is no one/one correspondence in exponence
between the item which enters into lexical relations and any one of the
grammatical units. It is for this reason that the term "lexical item" is used
in preference to "word," "word" being reserved as the name for a gram-
matical unit, that unit whose exponents, more than those of any other unit,
are lexical items.
Not only may the lexical item be coextensive with more than one
different grammatical unit; it may not be coextensive with any grammatical
unit at all, and may indeed cut right across the rank hierarchy. Moreover,
since the abstraction involved is quite different, what is for lexis "the same"
lexical item (that is, different occurrences of the same formal item) may be
71 That is, have not yet been shown to be dependent on grammatical categories, and
must therefore be postulated to be independent until shown to be otherwise: on the
general theoretical principle that heterogeneity is to be assumed until disproved by
correlation. Recent (unpublished) work by Mcintosh suggests that lexical relations may,
in some cases, be better described by reference to grammatical restrictions of variable
extent; if so, this will affect both the theory of lexis and the relations between the levels
oflexis and grammar. Cf. below, 8.2.
2-w.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
274 M. A. K. HALLIDAY
a number of different grammatical items, so it is not true that one lexical
item always has the same relation to the rank hierarchy. So that, in English,
(i) a lexical item may be a morpheme, word, or group (at least); (ii) a
lexical item may be assigned to no rank, being for example more than a
word but less than a whole group, or even both more and less than a
word-part of one word plus the whole of another, sometimes discon-
tinuously, and (iii) one and the same lexical item may in different occur-
rences cover any range of the possibilities under (i) and (ii). 72
This does not mean that lexical items cannot be identified in grammar;
it means that they are not identified by rank. They are identified, as has
been suggested (above, 6.3), by their being unaccounted for in systems. But
72 Two familiar examples may be cited, both exponents of the grammatical unit
"clause:" (i) "John ran up a big hill" and (ii) "John ran up a big bill:"
(i) (ii)
Primary structure:
SPA SPC
Exponent of P: class:
verbal
verbal
of unit:
group
group
formal item:
"ran"
.. ran up"
Down the rank scale, verbal groups "ran" and "ran up":
(i)
Primary structure:
Exponent of F: class:
of unit:
formal item:
F
verb finite
word
''ran''
(ii)
FPo
verb finite
word
"ran"
In (i), the lexical item is "ran," exponent of both the unit "group" and the unit "word."
If after further analysis "ran" is a compound word with two elements of structure whose
exponents are morphemes, then the lexical item is "run" which is an exponent of the
unit "morpheme." In (ii) the lexical item is "ran up" which is exponent of the unit
"group" but above the rank of the word. (Orthography does not of course provide
criteria for grammatical units; like phonology, it must be stated separately and then re-
lated to grammar, though if a one/one correspondence between orthographic and
grammatical categories is found to work at any point, so much the better. The space in
fact will not do in every case as exponent of the boundary of the grammatical unit
"word" in English. Here however to treat (things like) "run up" as a single word, the
only purpose of which would be to maximalize the in any case very partial correspon-
dence between "word" and lexical item, considerably complicates the description of the
verbal group.) If the analysis is taken to the morpheme, the lexical item is "run up,"
which contains one morpheme (but not the other) from the structure of the word "ran"
plus another word from the structure of the group-it is both more and less than a
grammatical word. Even if this type of morphemic analysis is rejected, the grammatically
discontinuous lexical item will appear in "John was running up a big bill," where the
analysis of "running" as a two morpheme word structure presumably would be
accepted; and even where all words have simple structure, as in "John may run up a big
bill," the lexical item, though not discontinuous, is an exponent of no grammatical unit,
since it is more than a word but less than a group.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
CATEGORIES OF THE THEORY OF GRAMMAR 275
it is an additional, descriptive reason (additional, that is, to the theoretical
one that lexical items lend themselves to different relations of abstraction)
for keeping grammar and lexis apart. When the two have been described
separately, the next stage is to relate them; and it is here that the complex
relation between lexical item and grammatical unit must be accounted for.
This is exactly parallel to what was said above (7.1) about grammar and
phonology; and, of course, it applies equally to phonology and lexis,
where, after separate description, is displayed the relationship between the
lexical item and the categories of phonology.
8.2. The task of lexis can be summed up, by illustration, as that it has to
account for the likelihood of "wingless green insects" and for the, by con-
trast, unlikelihood of "colourless green ideas." 73 As in grammar, we shall
expect language to work by contrasting "more likely" with "less likely"
rather than "possible" with "impossible;" but, as has often been pointed
out, 74 this particular type of likelihood is not accounted for by grammar, at
least not by grammar of the delicacy it has yet attained. It is however too
often assumed that what cannot be stated grammatically cannot be stated
formally: that what is not grammar is semantics, and here, some would
add, linguistics gives up. 75 But the view that the only formal linguistics is
grammar might be described as a colourless green idea that sleeps furiously
between the sheets of linguistic theory, preventing the bed from being
made. What are needed are theoretical categories for the formal descrip-
tion of lex is.
73 Cf. Chomsky, Syntactic Structures, pp. 15 ff.
74 e.g. by Chomsky, Joe. cit. Chomsky, however, does not countenance the formal
study of lexis. In the present view, the concept of "grammatical" and "ungrammatical"
is paralleled by that of "lexical" and "unlexical," this being the basic reason why
(Chomsky, op. cit., p. 16) "the notion 'grammatical in English' cannot be identified in
any way with the notion 'high order of statistical approximation to English':" "colour-
less green ideas sleep furiously" is "unlexical." "Lexical meaning" in the present theory
is thus not the same as is meant by Chomsky on p. 108; it is one part ("grammatical
meaning" being the other) of the formal meaning of language, and "formal meaning" is
one part (the other being "contextual meaning") of the total meaning of language.
75 This view (that linguistics excludes the study of (non-formal) meaning) is probably
no longer widely held. It is not within the scope of the present paper to discuss contextual
meaning; but briefly, since context relates form to extratextual features, and is (like
phonology) an interlevel, the categories of context, like those of phonology, are not
determined by (still less, of course, do they determine) the categories of form; but con-
textual statement is required to account for all (instances of the) reflexion in form of
extratextual features. For the statement of context, as distinct from either "content" or
"concept," see especially Firth, "Synopsis," pp. 5-13 (and, in connexion with this,
"Papers," p. 227, "Applications," pp. 2, 3) and "Ethnographic Analysis and Language"
(Man and Culture, ed. Raymond Firth, London 1957).
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
276 M. A. K. HALLIDAY
It seems that two fundamental categories are needed, which we may call
"collocation" and "set." 76 The first basic distinction between these and the
categories of grammar is that in lexis there are no scales of rank and ex-
ponence. There is no hierarchy of units; therefore no rank scale. There is
only one degree of abstraction-a set is a set of formal items and a colloca-
tion is a collocation of formal items; therefore no exponence scale
(exponence there is, of course, but it is a simple polarity). Only the
scale of delicacy remains; sets and collocations can be more and less
delicate.
There is an analogy with the categories of grammar, an analogy due to
the nature of language as activity. Collocation, like structure, accounts for
a syntagmatic relation; set, like class and system, for a paradigmatic one.
There the resemblance ends.
Collocation is the syntagmatic association of lexical items, quantifiable,
textually, as the probability that there will occur, at n removes (a distance
of n lexical items) from an item x, the items a, b, c .... Any given item
thus enters into a range of collocation, the items with which it is collocated
being ranged from more to less probable; and delicacy is increased by the
raising of the value of n and by the taking account of the collocation of an
item not only with one other but with two, three, or more other items.
Items can then be grouped together by range of collocation, according to
their overlap of, so to speak, collocational spread. The paradigmatic group-
ing which is thereby arrived at is the "set." The set does not form a closed
system, but is an open grouping varying in delicacy from "having some
(arbitrary minimum) collocation in common" to subsets progressively
differentiated as the degree of collocational likeness set as defining criterion
increases. 77
In lexis, as in grammar, it is essential to distinguish between formal and
contextual meaning. 78 Once the formal description has identified the cate-
gories and the items, these can and must be treated contextually. The
formal item of lexis, the "lexical item," is unrestricted grammatically;
76 Cf. Firth, "Synopsis," pp. 11-13, 26-27 and 31; T. F. Mitchell "Syntagmatic Rela-
tions in Linguistic Analysis" (Transactions of the Philological Society 1958), pp. 108 If.;
my "Secret History," pp. 156-175.
77 Analogous to the morphological grouping (the "paradigm") of grammar is the
lexical"ordered series of words": cf. Firth, "Papers," p. 228-though Firth's "ordered
series of words" includes what I should consider a "lexical set," namely his "lexical
groups by association," these being (by analogy) "syntactical."
78 The traditional vehicle of lexical statement, the dictionary, states formal meaning by
citation and contextual meaning by definition. The theoretical status of lexicographical
definition (Firth's "shifted terms"-"Synopsis," p. II) needs to be carefully examined.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
CATEGORIES OF THE THEORY OF GRAMMAR 277
grammatical categories do not apply to it, 79 and the abstraction of the item
itself from a number of occurrences (including, for example, the answer to
the question whether one is to recognize one lexical item or more than one)
depends on the formal, lexical relations into which it enters. The nature of
these relations is such that formal statements in lexis require textual studies
involving large scale frequency counts: not of course of the frequency of
single items, but of items in collocation. Since these are no longer difficult
to undertake, it should not be long before we find out much more about
how language works at this level.
AN ANALOGY
9.1. Eating, like talking, is patterned activity, and the daily menu may be
made to yield an analogy with linguistic form. Being an analogy, it is
limited in relevance; its purpose is to throw light on, and suggest problems
of, the categories of grammar by relating these to an activity which is
familiar and for much of which a terminology is ready to hand.
The presentation of a framework of categories for the description of
eating might proceed as follows:
Units: Daily menu
Meal
Course
Helping
Mouthful
Unit: Daily Menu
Elements of primary structure
Primary structures
Exponents of these elements (primary
classes of unit "meal")
E, M, L, S ("'early," "main," ''light,"
"snack")
EML EMLS (conflated as EML(S))
E: 1 (breakfast)
M: 2 (dinner)
L: 3} (no names available; see secon-
S: 4 dary classes)
79 Cf. above, 7.4 n. 71. The point, however, is: what is to be regarded as "one" lexical
item? Dictionaries, in general, mix grammatical and lexical criteria: in the Shorter
Oxford Dictionary, for example, "cut v." (defined as "to penetrate so as to sever the con-
tinuity of with an edged instrument") and "cut sb." ("the act of cutting") are shown as
separate items having the same relation to each other as "bear v." ("to support and
remove; to carry") and "bear sb." ("a heavily-built, thick-furred plantigrade quadruped
... "). But formally (quite apart from the fact that one contextual statement will cover
both cut v. and cut sb. but not both bear v. and bear sb.) the pairs are quite distinct: there
is a high degree of overlap in the range of collocation of cut v. and cut sb., which is not
the case with bear v. and bear sb. Collocation provides a formal criterion for the
identification of the lexical item.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
278 M. A. K. HALLIDAY
Secondary structures
Exponents of secondary elements (sys-
tems of secondary classes of unit
"meal")
ELaSaM ELaM EMLbSb EMSaLe
La: 3.1 (lunch)
Lb: 3.2 (high tea)
Le: 3. 3 (supper)
Sa: 4.1 (afternoon tea)
Sb: 4.2 (nightcap)
System of sub-classes of unit "meal"
E: 1.1 (English breakfast)
1.2 (continental breakfast)
Passing to the rank of the "meal," we will follow through the class
"dinner:"
Unit: Meal, Class: dinner
Elements of primary structure
Primary structures
Exponents of these elements (primary
classes of unit "course")
Secondary structures
Exponents of secondary elements (sys-
tems of secondary classes of unit
"course")
Systems of sub-classes of unit "course"
Exponential systems operating in meal
structure
__,.
F, S, M, W, Z ("first," "second,"
"main," ~'sweet,,, ~'savoury")
MW MWZ MZW FMW FMWZ
FMZW FSMW FSMWZ FSMZW
(conflated as (F(S)MW(Z))
F: 1 (antipasta)
S: 2 (fish)
M: 3 (entree)
W: 4 (dessert)
Z: 5 (cheese*)
(various, involving secondary elements
Fa .. d, Ma,b, Wa.e)
Fa: 1.1 (soup)
Fb: 1.2 (hors d'oeuvres)
Fe: 1.3 (fruit)
Fd: 1.4 (fruit juice)
Ma: 3.1 (meat dish)
Mb: 3.2 (poultry dish)
Wa: 4.1 (fruit*)
Wb: 4.2 (pudding)
We: 4.3 (ice cream*)
Fa: 1.11 (clear soup*)
1.12 (thick soup*)
S: 2.01 (grilled fish*)
2.02 (fried fish*)
2.03 (poached fish*)
Wb: 4.21 (steamed pudding*)
4.22 (milk pudding*)
Fe: grapefruit/melon
Fd: grapefruit juice/pineapple juice/
tomato juice
Ma: beef/mutton/pork
Mb: chicken/turkey/duck/goose
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
CATEGORIES OF THE THEORY OF GRAMMAR 279
At the rank of the "course," the primary class "entree" has secondary
classes "meat dish" and "poultry dish." Each of these two secondary
classes carries a grammatical system whose terms are formal items. But
this system accounts only for simple structures of the class "entree," those
made up of only one member of the unit "helping." The class "entree"
also displays compound structures, whose additional elements have as
exponents the (various secondary classes of the) classes "cereal" and
"vegetable." We will glance briefly at these:
Unit: Course, Class: entree
Elements of primary structure
Primary structures
Exponents of these elements (primary
classes of unit "helping")
Secondary structures
Exponents of secondary elements (sys-
tems of secondary classes of unit
"helping")
J, T, A ("joint," "staple," "adjunct")
J JT JA JTA (conflated as J((T) (A)))
J: I (flesh)
T: 2 (cereal)
A: 3 (vegetable)
(various, involving-among others-
secondary elements Ja, b, Ta, b, Aa, b)
Ja: 1.1 (meat) } systems as at M in
Jb: 1.2 (poultry) meal structure
Ta: 2.1 (potato)
Tb: 2.2 (rice)
Aa: 3.1 (green vegetable*)
Ab: 3.2 (root vegetable*)
And so on, until everything is accounted for either in grammatical systems
or in classes made up of lexical items (marked *). The presentation has
proceeded down the rank scale, but shunting is presupposed throughout:
there is mutual determination among all units, down to the gastronomic
morpheme, the "mouthful."
Like the morpheme, the mouthful is the smallest unit, and all eating
activity can be broken down into mouthfuls. Like the morpheme, it is
neither more nor less fundamental than any other unit. But how little it
reveals, if description proceeds in one direction from it, of the complexity
of the whole activity!
Our predecessors thought of language as an organism, and drew their
analogies from evolution. We reject this as misleading; but no less mis-
leading is its familiar substitute, according to which language is an edifice
and the morphemes are the bricks. Perhaps if language had been thought
of as activity we should never have heard of "morphemics." It is unfair on
one who was among the greatest figures in linguistic science to call the
"bricks and edifice" view of language "Bloomfieldian"-and I do not
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
280 M.A. K. HALLIDAY
know that Bloomfield ever used this analogy.80 But if I may use "Bloom-
fieldian" as a shorthand name for a view of language, and a body of de-
scriptive method, though of course with many individual varieties, which
has had wide currency for the last quarter of a century and owes a very
great deal to Bloomfield's work, I would like to consider what seem to me
to be certain questionable features of "Bloomfieldian" linguistics. What is
being called in question is really the theory (and perhaps the analogy) of
how language works.
THE SEVEN SINS
10.1. From the point of view of the present theory, there are seven features
of what is here labelled "Bloomfieldian" method which would perhaps
justify critical comment.81 These are:
(!) confusion of" level·· with "rank"
(2) confusion of" rank" with "exponence"
(3) conflation of different level levels
(4) overemphasis on lowest unit
(5) reluctance to shunt
(6) reluctance to shade
(7) distribution of redundancy
RO An analogy which Bloomfield did use was that of the signal: "Accordingly, the
signals (linguistic forms, with morphemes as the smallest signals) consist of different
combinations of the signalling-units (phonemes), and each such combination is ar-
bitrarily assigned to some feature of the practical world ('sememe')" (Language, p. 162).
This runs the risk of suggesting the analogy of a code-or even that language "is" a
code. If language is a code, where is the pre-coded message? Cf. my (review of) Herdan:
Language as Choice and Chance in Archiuum Linguisticum XI (ii).
81 Detailed references are not given in this section. It is recognized, as already re-
marked, that what is here called "Bloomfieldian" method is an abstraction from a large
body of descriptive work by different linguists, within which there is considerable
variety and disagreement even on basic issues. Roughly it covers the work based on what
Hockett called the "item and arrangement" model. It is not of course suggested that all
the points made in this section are applicable to all such studies, nor all of them to any
one study, within this type of linguistics. Since I have been concerned to apply the present
theory in the description of English, many of the points made here were in fact first
formulated with reference to A. A. Hill's Introduction to Linguistic Structures, which in-
corporates what is probably the best comprehensive account of English grammar yet
published and is an example of the method here referred to. Hill's book has recently been
the subject of a review article by Haas ("Linguistic Structures," Word XVI (ii)); my
present aim differs from Haas' in that I want to consider certain features of an approach
in descriptive linguistics, exemplified by Hill's work but also by many other studies, in
the light of the theory here outlined.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
CATEGORIES OF THE THEORY OF GRAMMAR 281
The confusion of level with rank takes a specific form: the relation
between different units at one level (morpheme ... sentence) is conflated
with the relation between two different levels, grammar and phonology.
Ranged on a single scale ("from phoneme to utterance") are (i) the move
between phonology and grammar (which moreover always goes from the
"inter level" to the level: cf. below, I 0.3) and (ii) the move between units
(which moreover always goes from the lowest to the highest: cf. below,
10.5) in (a) phonology and (b) grammar. In description, this leads to un-
wanted complexity and thus weakens the power of the grammar: one must
be free to recognize grammatical units whose exponents in substance both
overlap with and completely fail to coincide with the units carrying phono-
logical contrasts.82 In the theory, there is a confusion of abstractions: the
abstraction involved in relating one unit to another at the same level is
quite different from that involved in relating one level to another. The
sense in which a sentence "consists of" morphemes is stated in description
with reference to its definition in the theory, and is totally different from
the sense in which a morpheme "consists of" phonemes-indeed it is
doubtful if there is any meaningful sense in which a morpheme consists of
phonemes. (The contrastive use of "morph" and "morpheme" is designed
to build in an extra stage to account for the two kinds of abstraction. But
it does not get over the first (descriptive) difficulty; nor in fact does it solve
the theoretical one, since morph and phoneme differ in the extent and
kind of formal determination underlying their phonological abstraction. 83)
10.2. The relation among the units also tends to be confused with the rela-
tion between a category and its exponent(s). It is assumed that in moving
up the rank scale, from morpheme to sentence, one is also moving up the
exponence scale. It is true (as said above, 6.2 and 7.3) that in compre-
hensive description, in order to display the full grammaticalness of
language, one takes the final step on the exponence scale at the lowest rank
82 Especially since a language may make systemic use of this variable (cf. 4.2 n. 37
above, where it is suggested that it is desirable to recognize in English a grammatical
system the exponent of which is precisely the contrast between coextensiveness of the
grammatical unit with one and with (a sequence of) two exponents of a phonological
unit).
83 Cf. above, 4.2 n. 37. Hill's proportion, however, is
morph : morpheme : allomorph ::
sound : phoneme : allophone.
"Every morpheme must contain one phoneme and may contain several" (p. 89) and, for
English, "the occurrence of any juncture always marks the boundary of an entity larger
than a phoneme. The entity thus bounded may be word, phrase or sentence, but must
always be at least a morph" (pp. 93-94). The phoneme thus enters into the statement
both of the unit "morpheme" and of its structure.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
282 M.A.K.HALLIDAY
possible (though this, as already shown, is by no means always the mor-
pheme),84 and this is probably the reason for the confusion of rank with
exponence. But the scales of rank and exponence are again different
dimensions of abstraction, and one can link any unit directly to its formal
exponent (and through this to its exponent in substance): the relation of an
exponent of the unit "sentence" to the category of sentence is exactly the
same as that of an exponent of the unit "morpheme" to the category of
morpheme.
10.3. The confiation of levels referred to is the confiation of grammar and
phonology, which follows, though is distinct, from the confusion of level
with rank (above, 10.1). The theoretical basis of this criticism is complex
but crucial. Any distinction in substance may (i) be a free variant, in which
case it is formally meaningless, or it may (ii) carry a distinction in form,
with meaning either at the grammatical or at the lexical level. ss All formal
distinctions presuppose some distinction in substance,s6 and once a dis-
tinction in substance is shown to carry a formal distinction it must be
.accounted for in phonology.s7 But no relation whatever is presupposed
g4 That is, the final step of the formal statement, the move to the formal item. Strictly,
since formal statement includes the placing of all forms at all units, it would be more
accurate to say "though it is by no means always at morpheme rank that systems of
formal items are to be found." For example in English the items "when," "because,"
"if," "in case," "provided that," etc., though they can of course be analyzed into words
and morphemes, operate as items at the rank of the group and, as such, are members of
a particular class of the group.
85 So if we find in three languages items in substance statable phonetically as [patal and
[pate}, these may yield:
Substance
[a]/[e]
Form
-(free variant)
singular/plural (grammar)
'cat'/'dog' (lexis)
(Phonologically restricted variants may be of either type: the language might have
[pata] and [pete], never [pate] or [peta], without prejudice to whether the contrast
between [pata] and [pete] is formally meaningful (L2,3) or not (LJ).)
86 It does not matter, of course, what type of distinction is made in substance: the pair
above could equally be replaced by
e.g. [pat] and [pat], or ['pata] and [pa'ta], etc.
R7 Again it does not matter where: the following grammatical contrasts in English are
carried by substantial features requiring very different phonological statements:
Form Phonology
(unit) (contrast)
I work: I worked they've worked: they'd worked phoneme: addition of segment /t/
: replacement of /v/ by /d/
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
CATEGORIES OF THE THEORY OF GRAMMAR 283
between the categories required to state the distinction in form (grammar
or lexis) and the categories required to state phonologically the distinction
in substance which carries it.88 For example: the units may not be co-
extensive, and a variable relation of phonological unit to grammatical unit
may be the very thing that carries a formal system (cf. above, 10.1 n. 82);
or a single system in grammar may be carried by different phonological
distinctions, say two of its terms by tone and a third by addition of a
segment; or a phonological system, such as tone associated with a given
unit (recognized as phonological because it carries some formal distinction),
may carry different formal distinctions, part grammatical and part lexical,
or terms in different grammatical systems. 89
The categories required by the grammar, and the criteria for these,
should come from within grammar. They are set up to provide a descrip-
tion that is comprehensive, consistent, and maximally powerful. In the de-
finition of, for example, the unit "clause," the requirement is that it should
yield classes and structures which make possible the description of the
he was working: was he working
he was/working: he/was working
syllable: change in sequence
foot: shift of unit boundary (so re-
distribution of strong and weak
syllables-change of tonicity)
//1 he was/working//://4 he was/working//
tone group: replacement of one term
in intonation system by another
The phonological statement cannot necessarily be expected to cover the systems con-
cerned: it would be absurd, for example, to state the affirmative: interrogative system in
phonological terms-though, as said below, it must carry the potentiality of being so
stated, since it presupposes a distinction in substance.
88 Phonology relates form to substance by providing for a separate statement of
abstraction from substance for those features that are formally meaningful. The relevant
section of the diagram in 1. 7 n. 10 above could be more delicately represented as:
Substance" ... Form
I ""'- phonology ./ .· /
I t .,_ __ I
with the dotted line representing the (logically) final stage in which two separate state-
ments of abstraction are related. Cf. Robins, '"Status of grammar," p. 103: "(grammatical
distinctions are) not deducible from the phonetic shapes, as such, of the words con-
cerned nor from phonological rules based on these shapes and the phonetic categories
involved in them .... While both phonological and grammatical categories are abstrac-
tion from the phonic material of utterance, their relation to the phonic material is entirely
different."
89 For example the phonological system of intonation in English, operating at the rank
of the phonological unit "tone group," carries a number of different grammatical systems
operating at different units in the grammar.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
284 M. A. K. HALLIDAY
sentence, the group and so on in terms of their structures and classes:
hence the mutual definition of all units and of all grammatical categories
(and, procedurally, until a description is "comprehensive" (primary deli-
cacy at all ranks) all parts of it remain subject to revision). A grammatical
category is not required to be identifiable by reference to a particular
feature of substance stated phonologically: it merely carries the potenti-
ality of being stated in phonological terms through a long chain of
cxponence. 9o
(The starting point here of course is the theory of grammar, so that what
is being considered, and objected to, is the identification of grammatical
categories on phonological criteria. For linguistic theory as a whole, the
question must also be formulated the other way round: do we derive
phonological categories from formal ones? For example, in the last case
mentioned in the first paragraph of this section, would we state one phono-
logical system of tone or more than one? The nature of phonology as an
"interlevel" suggests that its categories should be derived from those of
form; and this is usually done in prosodic phonology, as developed by
Firth and others, though it is not an inherent requirement of prosodic
method.9 1 Inter-level dependence in this direction is theoretically justifiable,
since the role of phonology is to account for the formally meaningful
organization of phonic substance. But it has descriptive dangers: first, that
a system carried only by variable relation between grammatical and phono-
logical unit may be missed, and second, that unless a comprehensive formal
description has first been made, formal features may be distorted into a
90 Thus, the clause in English is defined by its operation in sentence structure, and by
its own classes and their structures. The difference between two instances, such as an
affirmative clause "he saw them" and an interrogative clause "did he see them?", is of
course ultimately statable in terms of substance; but grammar is not grammar if it tries
to define the class system in this way-or even to state the difference phonologically at
all. No linguist would ever try to state the grammar of clause classes by reference to
phonology; yet the attempt to define the unit "clause" by reference to phonological
features such as juncture is no less objectionable-and leads, not surprisingly, to a
phonology in which any substantial feature is a possible exponent of any term in the
phonological system!
91 A phonological description will, in this view, be prosodic if (i) it incorporates a rank
scale, with a hierarchy of units to which contrasts are assigned, and (ii) it is polysystemic,
so that, for example, the /t/ in 10.3 n. 87 above is not "the phoneme /t/" of "the English
language'' (no such entity will be postulated) but a phoneme identified by reference to its
place in the structure of the unit concerned: this would still be true whether the phono-
logical units concerned are (partly) taken over from grammar or are set up indepen-
dently in the phonology. Firth stresses the very different nature of the "phoneme" in a
description of this type, and prefers to use the distinct term "phonematic unit" (cf.
"Papers," Chap. 9, passim).
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
CATEGORIES OF THE THEORY OF GRAMMAR 285
phonological mould-the phonologist may take the "word" class "verb"
as a phonological unit, but he (or someone) must have described the
grammar first, or his "word" and "verb" may not turn out to be the
grammarian's "word" and "verb.")
To be precise, then, what is being criticized here has again both a theo-
retical and a descriptive aspect. In the theory, it is the use of phonologically
stated features as crucial criteria for grammatical categories, as when supra-
segmental phonemes are used as criteria for the category of "phrase." 92 A
phrase is a phrase because it operates in the structure of the unit above it
and has its own structures in terms of the unit below it. It has then to be
related to the phonological categories which are arrived at by a different
process of abstraction on the basis of the minimal requirement that some
formal distinction is always involved. If at any point this yields a one/one
relation of categories, so much the better: if the phrase turns out to be
exponentially coextensive with the tone group, the latter can be used as a
recognition signal for the former. But it remains a signal, not a criterion.
In description, the trouble arises when phonological features are used as
grammatical criteria even when they clash. If, for example, the segment
which carries tone contrasts, or is bounded by juncture features, will not
work as a grammatical unit, then tone and juncture are. no use even as
recognition signals; so to "define," say, the clause by reference to tone or
juncture one has to set up a phonological system in which any feature in
substance can be an allophone of any term in the system. There will be
clash; and if it is recognized in the first place that there is nothing at all
surprising when, say, units carrying formal patterns do not coincide with
those carrying patterns of the organization of substance, then the search
for one/one phonological identification signals of grammatical categories,
such as a phonological statement of clause boundary, can be abandoned as
being without profit. 93
10.4. In both grammar and phonology the smallest units, morpheme and
phoneme, are often assigned a special status distinct from that of any of the
92 Cf. Haas' reference to "a structure of a number of pyramids, all inverted" ("Lin-
guistic structures," p. 267).
93 I personally feel that English requires a totally different set of phonological units not
derived from the grammatical units. Intonation in English needs a carrier unit "tone
group" to display the (phonological) system of intonation; this system, and the terms in
it, can then be related to the grammar. The attempt to describe intonation in a frame-
work of "the intonation of the clause," "of the group," etc. is complicated and may lead
to a misunderstanding of the operation of the intonation system. But the attempt is not
theoretically sinful, as would be the attempt to describe the "grammar of the tone
group."
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
286 M.A. K. HALLIDAY
other units. Since the description usually proceeds unidirectionally up-
wards (consistently in phonology, and in grammar up to about group
rank: cf. below, 10.5) these units are treated first: they are then rated
(uniquely) fundamental, and in phonology "suprasegmental" features are
given phoneme status. The morpheme becomes a grammatical brick (here
the analogy does yield an interesting metaphor!) which is used to build the
larger units; and grammar-or at least that part of it that can be handled
in this way-becomes "morphemics," as phonology becomes "phonemics."
The result is sometimes referred to as excessive segmentation, though
this is not really the essence. The objection is not that structural analysis
is carried through to the morpheme: it is clearly necessary that it should be,
though not to the extent of requiring one morpheme with distinct seg-
mental exponent for each system in which the item in question is a term.94
The objection is that the smallest unit, being mistaken as fundamental by
contrast to the others, is made to do much too much work: to carry
features and contrasts which properly belong to larger units. The morpheme
is no more and no less "fundamental," being no more and no less an ab-
straction, than the sentence. It has enough patterns of its own to carry
without having foisted on it those that the language has distributed
elsewhere. 95
10.5. With the smallest unit as fundamental, the description starts off in an
upward direction. It proceeds, unidirectionally, from the morpheme,
through the word to somewhere around the group. 96 Not surprisingly, since
there is no shunting, it proves extremely difficult to take it further along
the same route. Shunting, or moving up and down the rank scale, is a part
of descriptive method imposed by the theory to show the relation among
the different units: to permit a unified description with links, through all
categories, all the way from morpheme to sentence. In the absence of
94 As in Hill's description of the English personal pronouns ("Introduction to Lin-
guistic Structures," pp. 145-148). This "playing games," or "party linguistics," is again
linked to the confusion of levels. Cf. Haas, "Linguistic Structures," p. 273.
95 I should thus agree with Robins, "In defence of WP" (Transactions of the Philological
Society, 1959) pp. 127-128: "The morpheme must be recognized as the minimal element
of grammatical structure; but this does not imply that it is the most suitable element to
bear the assignment of all the grammatical functions fulfilled by the word into whose
composition it enters." I would not follow Robins, however, when he says (p. 137) that
"In many ways ... the word is a unique entity in grammar, and not just a stage in the
progression 'from morpheme to utterance'." Robins rejects morpheme-based grammar
but suggests replacing it by word-based grammar; what is here suggested is a "multi-
unit" grammar in which no unit is "more unique" than any other.
96 On the implications of upward description cf. Haas, "Linguistic Structures,"
pp. 263-269.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
CATEGORIES OF THE THEORY OF GRAMMAR 287
shunting, the description has to jump to the top end of the rank scale and
proceed downward from the sentence by "immediate constituent" an-
alysis :97 still unidirectional, though with the direction reversed.
The hope is that, by digging the tunnel from both ends, the two will meet
in the middle. With the aid of a good homogeneous mathematics they
might; but two totally different bodies of method are involved, morphemics
and IC analysis, which are difficult to integrate. Moreover the middle
ranks of the grammar are often the most complex, presumably since they
face both ways; so that a grammar which starts unidirectionally from the
two ends will find it difficult to avoid leaving the middle ragged. Presenta-
tion can of course proceed in any direction that is desired; but it needs to
be based on a description that permits-indeed presupposes-constant
shunting.
10.6. It has been suggested at various places above that the theory cannot
validly regard constrasts and relations that are clearcut, and statable in
"yes/no" terms, as the norm in language. Even at the primary degree of
delicacy the description will encounter features where "shading" is neces-
sary: where a feature is better stated in terms of "more likely/less likely"
and a statement is more powerful when it accounts for only 90% of occur-
rences; and this becomes more true with every subsequent gain in delicacy.98
If this is built in to the theory as a basic property of language, there is no
need to try to turn all constrasts and relations into "yes/no" ones, an
attempt which may slant the choice of criteria. Criteria are sometimes
chosen for this purpose which make it necessary to account for a large
number of occurrences by changing them into something else, because they
do not display the contrast chosen as crucial. (This device is more readily
97 In which both the first unit and the first step must be primitive terms of the theory; cf.
Quirk (review of) "W. Nelson Francis: 'The Structure of American English'" Archiuum
Linguisticum XI (1959), 155: "We are left with the impression, if only because nothing is
said to the contrary, that 'the first split ... into immediate constituents' (409) is achieved
intuitively." Similarly the binarity is, as Bazell points out ("Linguistic Form," p. 5), a
feature of IC theory. For Chomsky likewise the sentence is a primitive term (Syntactic
Structures, pp. 30, 46), though this is not necessary to transformative-generative de-
scription as such (e.g. if it incorporated a rank scale, with rules for rank transformation).
98 Cf. the section "Surface and deep grammar" (and the concept of "valence") in
Hockett: Course in Modern Linguistics, pp. 246-249. The scale of delicacy is introduced
to account for what Hockett calls "deep grammar" (the "grammatical" nature of which
he rightly stresses). It is worth insisting, however, that delicacy is a cline; and that a
secondary statement, while accounting for the 10% of instances not accounted for in the
primary statement, at the same time yields a further set of categories and relations, and
these are likely in turn to account for only 80% of instances (these being now more
delicately differentiated); these now demand a further step in delicacy-and so on.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
288 M. A. K. HALLIDAY
tolerated by those who give relatively little weight to textual as opposed to
exemplificatory description.)
For example, the exponent of the element "subject" in English clause
structure is sometimes identified as being that nominal group which is in
person/number concord with the verbal group. But since a large number
of English clauses do not display this concord contrastively99 (quite apart
from those which violate it, as does the clause I have just written), the
textual application of this criterion has to rely on the substitution of all
other verbal groups by one in "is," "was," "has," or simple present form
and, if the two nominal groups are alike in number, on the dissimilation of
one of them. If instead one says that the exponent of "subject" is that
nominal group which precedes the verbal group with no other nominal
group in between, this can be stated as a high probability relation in spoken
English and is applicable to a textual study (in which it can be quantified)
without substitution. The next step is then to make more delicate state-
ments to account for the instances so far not accounted for, some of which
turn out to be grammaticizable and others, for the moment, not. And it
ceases to be puzzling why, if a foreigner (or native) says "my friends is
inviting the neighbour," every English speaker knows that it is the friends
who are doing the inviting and not the neighbour.
10.7. The problem of "redundancy" is complex, and needs treating separ-
ately and at length; but the term has become a commonplace in description
and a brief reference may be made here. The name is assigned to a number
of varied phenomena, none of which is related in any clear way to the
quantifiable redundancy of information theory. 100 These include relations
of formal categories to exponents in form, of formal and phonological
features to exponents in substance, and of formal features to context.
Moreover in some instances the so-called "redundancy" is simply put in by
the method of description and has no relevance to the language at all.
"Redundancy" is assigned to what is displayed as multiple exponence:
either in form, where more than one formal item is said to be the exponent
of one grammatical category, or in substance, where a distinction is carried
99 Of these four, only one does: "the dog is chasing the cat", "the dog is chasing the
cats", "the dog chased the cat", "the dog chased the cats".
1oo Hockett's statement of the link between the two (Course, p. 87), "In everyday par-
lance, this word means saying more than is strictly necessary ... In modern information
theory, the term has much the same meaning, but freed from the connotation of un-
desirability, and theoretically capable of precise quantification," may I think be taken
as underlying the uses of the term referred to in this section. In my view this formulation
reduces a potentially powerful concept to a status where it is neither rigorous nor useful
in linguistics.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
CATEGORIES OF THE THEORY OF GRAMMAR 289
by what is said to be more than one phonetic feature. But neither of these
is at all clearcut. Formal redundancy "occurs" where there is concord,
but no criteria are available for identifying the two prerequisites of con-
cord: that there is "more than one" exponent as opposed to "one," and
that these are exponents of "the same" category_IOI Discontinuous mor-
phemes, for example, may sometimes be clearly recognizable, though at
others it is impossible to say "how many" exponents are present ;102 but the
question is irrelevant, since where the description does recognize concord
this concord is itself the exponent of a distinct category of relation that is
different from the category of which the form is exponent, and that has its
own formal meaning.103 Redundancy in substance appears when formal or
phonological distinctions are related to contrastive features.l04 Here pre-
cisely the same problem arises, since it is not possible to give rigorous
criteria for deciding what is "one" phonetic feature and what is "more than
one. "105 Each time a new parameter or a further degree of differentiation is
introduced into the phonetic statement, all its precursors are thereby made
"redundant."
In extreme cases this "redundancy" becomes completely artificial, since
it is simply inserted by the description. This happens when a contrast (or
system) is assigned to a unit lower than that to which it is appropriate, and
JOt Harris recognizes this in his use of the "broken morpheme" (Methods in Structllral
Linguistics, pp. 165-167).
102 e.g. in the contrast between l'oeil and les yeux, or between have gone and were going.
If, in Old English, a nominal group consisting of a noun alone may carry four case/
number distinctions, one with adjective and noun six and one with deictic, adjective, and
noun seven, how can any two case/number forms be considered exponents of "the same"
category when they occur in different structures?
103 Harris states this distributionally (Methods, p. 205). Hill (Introduction to Linguistic
Structures, p. 477) rejects the redundancy of concord in Latin, on the grounds that it
"sorts out the members of the sentence element or construction for us," but accepts it in
Bantu "where there are repeated suffixes of agreement but in which the members of the
same sentence element are continuous." Quite apart from the arbitrary choice of assign-
ment of redundancy, this is simply a shift of criteria: Bantu concord is still the exponent
of a relation (since not all contiguous items are members of the same sentence element).
But even if concord and contiguity were completely mutually determined, the problem
would still not arise, since there would then be no valid reason for not treating the whole
complex as a single exponent.
104 Cf. Hill's statement of the English affricates (op. cit., p. 44): "In the system we have
adopted, therefore, affrication has not been mentioned, since /c/ is distinguished from /t/
by its position, and the affrication is redundant." Ebeling ("Linguistic Units" p. 30)
rightly rejects redundancy in substance: "A choice of one of the equivalent features as
relevant and the other as redundant is in such cases arbitrary and, therefore, senseless."
J os They might perhaps be acoustic, so that all but one of the formants which distinguish
[a] from (i] would be redundant?
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
290 M.A. K. HALLIDAY
may result therefore from overemphasis on the lowest unit. This tends to
happen more in phonology, when the phoneme is made to carry contrasts
appropriate to a higher unit; one of the merits of prosodic phonology is
that it avoids this error. 106 But it is not unknown in grammar, where it may
also arise from the use of morphological instead of syntactic criteria for
classes.107 In such cases "redundancy" can only refer to the loss of power in
the grammar brought about by such a description: it already follows from
the theory that the "appropriate" unit for the assignment of any feature is
the highest unit that can carry it without requiring the statement to be
made twice. The best description therefore can be thought of as that which
minimalizes artificial "redundancy." But at the same time those instances
where what is called "redundancy" is an artificial product of the descrip-
tion are not essentially different from, but are merely extreme cases of, the
"multiple exponence" in form and substance to which the same name is
applied.108
What is of doubtful validity here is the implication that there are formal
I 06 By assigning contrasts where they belong. Cf. for example Carnochan ("Glottaliza-
tion in Rausa", Transactions of the Philological Society, 1952, esp. p. 94); and all works
by linguists of the School of Oriental and African Studies, London, some of which are
referred to throughout this paper. Cf. also Robins, "Aspects of Prosodic Analysis"
(Proceedings of the University of Durham Philosophical Society 1 (series B), 1957).
107 If polarity in English, which belongs to the group, is assigned to the word, or
morpheme, "redundancy" arises: one can ask unreal questions such as "is the negative
in 'didn't go', in contrast to positive 'went', carried by the 'did' or the 'n't' or the 'go'?"
If the category of number is assigned to the unit "word" in any language that has a
nominal group which can select only one number at a time, there will be artificial
"redundancy" whether there is concord, negative concord or no concord at all, the
·•redundancy" of complementary distribution. Again, as in phonology: Cantonese, for
example, has pairs of syllables in which in final position short vowel plus long nasal
consonant contrasts with long vowel plus short nasal consonant. If these are phone-
micized as (e.g.) /a:n/, /an:/, /a/ contrasts with fa:/ and /n/ with /n:/; if as /aan/, /ann/,
/a/ contrasts with /n/ in penultimate position, but /an/ and /aann/ are absent: "re-
dundancy" in either case. If the contrast is referred to an element in the structure of a
higher unit, it can be stated as a single contrast of relative duration.
JOB Another use of this same "redundancy" which has not been mentioned here is con-
textual redundancy. This is used, for example, by Bull ("Time, tense and the verb"), p. 16:
'"Unless a language is needlessly redundant, there is little or no likelihood that any tense
system uses the point tensor formulas;" p. 27: "English is extremely redundant. It
almost always defines the axes while Mandarin is extremely parsimonious. It defines the
axes only to avoid confusion." In other words, the form is said to have reflected more of
the context than it need have done. This has the merit of having nothing whatever to do
with the redundancy of information theory. What it has to do with is not yet clear; but
it does pose interesting problems for contextual description and for comparison and
typology.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
CATEGORIES OF THE THEORY OF GRAMMAR 291
contrasts carried by "one" exponent and others carried by "more than
one," with a meaningful distinction between the two. Even if "multiple
exponence" in form can be validly identified, it is itself formally meaning-
ful; and it is arbitrary to postulate "one feature" as the norm of exponence
in substance. The use of the term "redundancy" is unfortunate for two
reasons. On the one hand it implies that some features, by contrast to
others,109 can be recognized as carried by something more than what
"would be enough"-to the extent even of suggesting that one may judge
which of a number of exponents is "the" non-redundant one.no On the other
hand, even if it is possible to devise some theoretically valid criteria for
"redundancy" of this kind, its relation to the redundancy of information
theory is extremely complex and it would be better not to call it by the
same name. The redundancy of information theory is of considerable in-
terest to linguistics in the study of the information carried by grammatical
systems; but this, as far as I know, has not yet been seriously attempted.
The quantification of systems, rather than the appraisal of features as
contrastive or idle, which rests on a very partial interpretation of the re-
dundancy of information theory, seems the more useful role for the concept
of redundancy in linguistics.
Most, if not all, of the points made in this section can be brought to-
gether under Chomsky's observation that "a linguistic theory should not
be identified with a manual of useful procedures, nor should it be ex-
pected to provide mechanical procedures for the discovery of grammar. "111
The point is a familiar one to British linguists, who have for some time
stressed the theoretical, as opposed to procedural, character of their own
approach.l12 But is it true that "it is unreasonable to demand of linguistic
theory that it provide anything more than a practical evaluation procedure
for grammars"? 113 This it must do. But it can be asked to do more: to
109 In fact, all description of language is the description of this "redundancy". A
language without it would presumably have to have only one sound, variable in duration,
and only one unit with either no structure or no class. Language activity is a progression
of events in environments; and as soon as we have stated the event (as one among a
defined number of possible events, this number being always less than the total number
of possible events in that language-"class") and the environment (this being defined as
not the same as all other environments-"structure") there is "redundancy".
110 An extreme instance is found in Hill (Introduction to Linguistic Structures, p. 26n.),
where we are told that every audible exponent of I+ I is redundant, the one contrastive
exponent being inaudible. Cf. Haas, "Zero in linguistic description" (Studies in Lin-
guistic Analysis), p. 37.
111 Syntactic Structures, p. 55n.
112 Cf. Firth, "Structural Linguistics," pp. 93, 99; "Synopsis," p. I.
113 Chomsky, Syntactic Structures, p. 52.
292 M. A. K. HALLIDAY
provide a framework of logically interrelated categories (so that it can be
evaluated as a theory, and compared with other theories) from which can
be derived methods of description, whether textual, exemplificatory, or
transformative-generative, which show us something of how language
works.
Department of English Language and General Linguistics
University of Edinburgh.
Downloaded by [162.247.72.216] at 21:17 14 March 2016
